<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89222-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.2-22-89.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 34 / Wednesday, February 22, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Federal Aviation Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">14 CFR Parts 61, 63, 65, 121, and 135</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 25804, Notice No. 89-4]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2120 AC 85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Special Federal Aviation Regulation No. XX; Advanced QualificationProgram</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This proposed Special Federal Aviation Regulation (SFAR)would establish a voluntary alternative method for meeting the training,evaluation, certification, and qualification requirements for flight crewmembers,flight attendants, aircraft dispatchers, instructors, evaluators and otheroperations personnel subject to the training requirements of 14 CFR Parts121 and 135. The FAA has developed this alternative method in responseto recommendations made by a task force composed of representatives fromthe government, airlines, aircrew professional organizations, and airlineindustry organizations. The proposed SFAR is designed to improve aircrewperformance and would allow certificate holders that are subject to thetraining requirements of Parts 121 and 135 to develop innovative trainingprograms that incorporate the most recent advances in training methodsand techniques.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be received on or before April 24, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Send or deliver comments on this notice in duplicateto: Federal Aviation Administration, Office of the Chief Counsel, Attention:Rules Docket (AGC-10), Room 915G, Docket No. 25804, 800 Independence Avenue,SW., Washington, DC 20591. Comments must be marked Docket No. 25804. Commentsmay be examined in the Rules Docket between 8:30 a.m. and 5 p.m. on weekdays,except Federal holidays.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. David Catey, Air Carrier Branch,Air Transportation Division, Flight Standards Service, Federal AviationAdministration, 800 Independence Avenue, SW., Washington, DC 20591; telephone(202) 267-8094.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Comments Invited</ITAG>Interested persons are invited to participate in the making of this proposedrule by submitting such written data, views, or arguments as they may desire.Communications should identify the regulatory docket or notice number andbe submitted in duplicate to the address above. All communications receivedon or before the closing date for comments will be considered by the Administratorbefore taking further rulemaking action. Persons wishing the FAA to acknowledgereceipt of their comments submitted in response to this notice must submitwith those comments a pre-addressed, stamped postcard on which the followingstatement is made: ``Comments to Docket No. 25804.'' The postcard willbe dated and time stamped and returned to the commenter. All comments submittedwill be available, both before and after the closing date for comments,in the Rules Docket for examination by interested persons. A report summarizingeach substantive public contact with FAA personnel concerned with thisrulemaking will be filed in the docket.<ITAG tagnum="84">Availability of NPRM</ITAG>Any person may obtain a copy of this NPRM by submitting a request to theFederal Aviation Administration, Office of Public Affairs, Attention: PublicInquiry Center (APA-230), 800 Independence Avenue, SW., Washington, DC20591, or by calling (202) 267-3484. Requests must identify the noticenumber of this NPRM. Persons interested in being placed on the mailinglist for future NPRM's should also request a copy of Advisory CircularNo. 11-2A, Notice of Proposed Rulemaking Distribution System, which describesthe application procedures.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Statement of the ProblemFederal Aviation Regulations that pertain to training programs and thepractical test portion of the certification requirements for pilots, flightinstructors, check airmen and other evaluators, flight crewmembers otherthan pilots, aircraft dispatchers, and other operations personnel appearin 14 CFR Parts 61, 63, 65, 121, and 135. The most detailed and rigoroustraining and qualification requirements are those contained in SubpartsN and O of Part 121. While Subparts N and O have been amended a numberof times in recent years, most of the amendments concern the use of simulatorsor other training devices or specific requirements such as the need fortraining in areas such as security and the transportation of hazardousmaterials. The last comprehensive changes to Subparts N and O were madein Amendment 121-55 issued on December 22, 1969 (35 FR 84, January 3, 1970).Some current requirements do not reflect recent advancements in aircrafttechnology or advancements in training methods and techniques. Certaintraining, checking, and testing requirements in the regulations are becomingobsolete for airline operations of advanced technology aircraft. The FAAhas been accommodating air carrier training needs by issuing exemptionsto current training program requirements.Another area in which current regulations have been an obstacle to developingefficient training programs is in the specific programmed hours requiredfor certain categories of training. In light of new training methods andthe advanced capabilities of new aircraft, these specific hours are notalways accurate. A portion of the hours now required to be spent on onephase of training could more efficiently be used in advanced training.Also of particular concern is the appropriateness and adequacy of the practicaltest requirements for airplane and rotocraft airline transport pilot certificatesand associated ratings prescribed in the tables and text on maneuvers andprocedures in Part 61, Appendices A and B, and the appropriateness andadequacy of the flight training and proficiency check requirements containedin Part 121. Appendices E and F. Some of the requirements are not applicableto certain new aircraft and to new methods of training.The introduction of advanced computer-based technology (e.g., fly-by-wire,digital vs. analog, flight-management systems, glass cockpits) onto theflight deck of transport aircraft has resulted in a dramatic recent changein the role and expertise expected of flight crewmembers. The proceduraland functional differences of aircraft having this new technology and thenecessarily difficult demands that are from time to time placed on crewmembersindividually and on crewmembers when functioning together as a team needto be reflected in crewmember training. In recent years a consensus hasdeveloped within industry and government that training should emphasizecrew coordination and the management of crew resources. Traditionally,airline training and checking has been weighted toward the pilot in command(PIC) with less stringent requirements for the other crewmembers. Thishas led to training and checking of pilots on an individual basis, in anenvironment which is not crew task oriented. Furthermore flight crewmembertraining historically has focused on flying skills and systems knowledgewhile neglecting factors such as communication skills, coordination anddecision making.Evidence accumulated in the last decade suggests that a high percentageof air carrier incidents and accidents have been caused, at least in part,by a failure of the flightcrew to use readily available resources. NationalAeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) studies performed over thelast ten years indicate that more than 60% of fatal air carrier accidentswere not directly linked to mechanical failure or lack of pilot skillsbut rather to a breakdown in cockpit communication. These NASA studiesemphasize a deficiency in present recurrent training in areas related tohuman factors.The name given to this area of skills is Cockpit Resource Management (CRM).CRM is generally understood to be the effective use of all resources availableto the crew_hardware, software, and all persons involved in aircraft operation_toachieve safe and efficient flight operations. While some airlines havedeveloped CRM programs, certainly not all who could benefit from such programsare doing so. Many who would like to incorporate such training need guidancein developing CRM programs.A training technique related to CRM, which is currently reflected in theregulations in andSection;121.409 and Part 121, Appendix H, is Line OrientedFlight Training (LOFT). LOFT training is required in Advanced SimulationTraining Programs to facilitate the transition from the simulator to lineflying. LOFT as defined in FAA Advisory Circular 120-35A (Line-OrientedFlight Training Programs) refers to the use of a complete crew (each linequalified) in a realistic, real-time, no jeopardy training environment(a simulation) where the results of crewmember actions are allowed to occurwithout instructor intervention. LOFT is a well proven method of providingpractice and feedback in crew coordination. Well-designed LOFT scenariosrequire the coordinated efforts of all crewmembers for successful performance.LOFT is particularly effective when coupled with meaningful feedback. Afeedback technique some carriers have effectively used is videotape feedback.HistoryIn 1975, the FAA began to deal with two issues in Part 121 pilot trainingand checking. These issues were hardware requirements for total simulationand the redesign of training programs to deal with increasingly complexhuman factors problems and to increase the benefits derived from the simulation.At the urging of the air transportation industry, the FAA addressed thehardware issue first. This effort culminated in 1980 in the developmentof the Advanced Simulation program, set forth in Part 121, Appendix H.Since then the FAA has continued to pursue approaches for the redesignof training programs to increase the benefits of Advanced Simulation andto deal with the increasing complexity of cockpit human factors.In December 1986, in response to a Safety Recommendation from the NationalTransportation Safety Board (NTSB), the FAA initiated a program in thearea of Aviation Behavioral Technology which developed and applied behavioralanalysis and technology to improve flight safety. The ongoing program includesprojects on increased line-oriented training to enhance cockpit resourcemanagement, improve cockpit/cabin communication and coordination, and improvepilot decisionmaking.On August 27, 1987, FAA's Administrator McArtor addressed the chief pilotsand certain executives of many air carriers at a meeting held in KansasCity. One of the issues discussed at the meeting focused on flight crewmemberperformance issues. This meeting led to the creation of a Joint Government-IndustryTask Force on flight crew performance comprised of representatives frommajor air carriers and air carrier associations, flight crewmember associations,commuter air carriers and regional airline associations, and governmentorganizations. On September 10, 1987, the task force met at the Air TransportAssociation's headquarters to identify and discuss flight crewmember performanceissues. Working groups in three major areas wide formed: (1) Man/machineinterface, (2) flight crewmember training, and (3) operating environment.Each working group submitted a report and recommendations to the JointTask Force. On June 8, 1988, the recommendations of the Joint Task Forcewere presented to Administrator McArtor. The Task Force recommendationsand minutes of Task Force meetings have been placed in the public docketfor this rulemaking.The major substantive recommendations to the Administrator from the flightcrewmember training work group were the following: (1) Require Part 135commuters whose airplane operations require two pilots to comply with Part121 training checking, qualification and record keeping requirements; (2)provide for a Special Federal Aviation Regulation and Advisory Circularto permit development of innovative training programs; (3) establish aNational Air Carrier Training Program Office which provides training programoversight at the national level; (4) require seconds in command to satisfactorilyperform their duties under the supervision of check airmen during operatingexperience; (5) require all training to be accomplished through a certificateholder's training program; (6) provide for approval of training programsbased on course content and training aids rather than using specific programmedhours; (7) require Cockpit Resource Management Training and encourage greateruse of Line Oriented Flight Training.Specific recommendations were listed regarding regulatory changes and wereseparated into those changes which the Task Force thought should be incorporatedinto a Special Federal Aviation Regulation (SFAR) and in an accompanyingAdvisory Circular and those which the Task Force thought should be proposedin a subsequent rulemaking action. An SFAR is used by the FAA to issueregulations with short term effect or when the special nature of a regulatorychange makes it impractical to amend existing regulations. Since this proposalwould establish a voluntary alternative program and since it affects numeroussections in Parts 61, 63, 65, 121 and 135, an SFAR is appropriate.In June of 1988, the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) issueda Safety Recommendation (A-88-71) on the subject of CRM training. The recommendationstemmed from an NTSB accident investigation of a Northwest Airline crashon August 16, 1987, in which 148 passengers, 6 crewmembers, and 2 peopleon the ground were killed.The NTSB noted that both pilots had received single-crewmember trainingduring their last simulator training and proficiency checks and that thelast CRM training they had received was 3.5 hours of ground school (general)CRM training in 1983. As a result of its investigation, the NTSB recommendedthat all Part 121 carriers:<ITAG tagnum="21">Review initial and recurrent flightcrew training programs to ensurethat they include simulator or aircraft training exercises which involvecockpit resource management and active coordination of all crewmember traineesand which will permit evaluation of crew performance and adherence to thosecrew coordination procedures.</ITAG>FAA DeterminationIn response to the recommendations from the Joint Task Force, the FAA isissuing this proposed SFAR which provides a voluntary alternative methodfor meeting the training, evaluation, certification, and qualificationrequirements in Parts 61, 63, 65, 121, and 135. It applies to all certificateholders required to have an approved training program under andSection;andSection;121.401 or 135.341 and all certificate holder personnel subject to thosetraining program requirements. This proposed voluntary alternative is calledan ``Advanced Qualification Program.'' At the same time, the FAA is issuingin draft form for public comment Advisory Circular 120-XX, Advanced QualificationPrograms, which will provide a means acceptable to the Administrator forapproval of an Advanced Qualification Program (AQP). The FAA will not issuea final rule based on this notice until it has received and consideredcomments on the draft Advisory Circular (AC). While the applicability ofthe proposed SFAR would cover all crewmembers, aircraft dispatchers, andother operations personnel, initially, the proposed alternative compliancemethod in the Advisory Circular would be limited to pilots and flight engineersand to those certificate holders that have available either an advancedflight training device or flight simulator for flight crewmember, flightinstructor and flight evaluator training and evaluation. Small operatorscan take advantage of this alternative by using training centers that qualifyunder this proposed SFAR.The FAA plans to develop alternative compliance methods for persons otherthan pilots and flight engineers. Until these compliance methods are issued,a certificate holder that wants its AQP to cover employees other than pilotsand flight engineers can submit for approval its own proposed compliancemethods.Recommendations from the Joint Task Force have been used as a baselinefor developing these proposals. Because of the successful task force effort,and because of the ongoing need to review and update training requirementsfor even more sophisticated aircraft, the FAA is considering establishinga training advisory committee under the Federal Advisory Committee Act.The proposed SFAR would not be applicable to the training requirementsin two specific areas, security training for crewmembers under andSection;andSection;121.417(b)(3)(v) and 135.331(b)(3)(v) and hazardous materials trainingunder andSection;andSection; 121.433a and 135.333, in order to avoid duplication.In the case of security training, the same objectives are being pursuedthrough a separate regulatory vehicle that is unique to security. The specificrequirements for security training are not set forth in the Federal AviationRegulations but, rather in each Air Carrier's Standard Security Program(ACSSP), a document that is not available to the general public. The ACSSP,which is required by FAR Part 108, may be amended by the Administratorin accordance with andSection; 108.25. Efforts are currently underway toamend the ACSSP to provide an alternative method of training, based oncourse content, similar to that proposed in this SFAR. In the case of hazardousmaterials training, the current requirements in andSection; 121.433a alreadyreflect the content-based approach proposed in this SFAR for other training.The FAA specifically requests comments on this exclusion of security andhazardous materials training from AQP curriculums. If the FAA concludes,based on comments received, that including security and hazardous materialstraining requirements in Advanced Qualification Programs is desirable,these requirements will be included in the final rule for this proposedSFAR.Subsequent to issuance of this proposed SFAR, the FAA plans to issue additionalNPRMs which will propose to implement other task force recommendations,such as, revise and upgrade Parts 121 and 135 training, testing and checking,and qualification requirements, including CRM and LOFT. Eventually theFAA intends to develop advisory circular guidance to include flight attendants,dispatchers, and other operations personnel in the advanced program.The FAA will continue to conduct research on the issues raised by the JointTask Force. In the long term, the FAA intends to gather information fromAQPs and crewmember performance statistics to evaluate the effects of AQPson performance. Specific areas for such evaluation would include, but notbe limited to, the need for CRM proficiency evaluation in practical testsfor airman certification; the need for evaluating proficiency in simulatedoperations scenarios rather than using these scenarios strictly as trainingactivities; and the optimum length of time for a recurring continuing qualificationcycle.The initial goal of the proposed SFAR is to improve flight crew performanceby providing alternative means of complying with certain current provisionsin the Federal Aviation Regulations which may inhibit innovative use ofsome modern technology that could facilitate the training of flight crewmembers.The SFAR would encourage carriers to become innovative in their approachto training.In response to a Joint Task Force recommendation, the FAA would establisha headquarters Air Carrier Training Branch. The Branch would set overallpolicy regarding AQPs and assure standard implementation of that policythroughout the FAA.General Discussion of the SFARThe proposed SFAR provides an alternative to the training and qualificationrequirements in Part 121 Subpart N_Training Programs and Subpart O_CrewmemberQualifications and in Part 135 Subpart H_Training and Subpart E_FlightCrewmember Requirements. The proposed SFAR also includes, for airman employeesof Part 121 and Part 135 certificate holders, alternatives to the practicaltest portion of the certification requirements in Parts 61, 63, and 65.Initially these practical test certification options would only be availableto pilots who hold a commercial pilot certificate with an instrument rating(discussed more fully in the section by section portion of this preamble).The AQP option would be available to any certificate holder who is requiredto have an approved training program under andSection;andSection; 121.401 or135.341 and who seeks and obtains FAA approval for its AQP.The proposed SFAR would provide flexibility and allow for innovation increwmember, aircraft dispatcher, and other operations personnel trainingprograms. In effect it would allow a certificate holder to establish trainingcurriculums which depart from current requirements as long as its AQP meetsthe SFAR requirements and provides at least an equivalent means of compliancewith current regulations in all categories of training and in all subjectcategories (e.g., windshear and emergency training). The SFAR would allowa certificate holder to tailor training curriculums to permit the maximumuse of flight simulators and other flight training devices.For example, one difference in requirements between the present rules andthe proposed SFAR is that in the current regulations, the training andqualification requirements for different types of operations vary withrespect to the balance between training and checking. In some areas thereis more emphasis on evaluation, to the detriment of training. One goalof the SFAR is to ensure that there is a proper balance between trainingand evaluation, so that each flight crewmember receives a proper amountof each.Another difference is that the proposed SFAR emphasizes the concept oftraining to proficiency, crewmember performance, and subject content andenvisions approval of ``planned'' hours of training, but does not requirea specific number of ``programmed'' hours as does present Part 121. Thetables provided in the Advisory Circular on maneuvers and procedures willbe more comprehensive and more relevant to current aircraft technologyand operational capability than those that appear in Part 121 AppendicesE and F. Some of the maneuvers and procedures required in the current tablescannot be performed in the new generation aircraft. Other maneuvers andprocedures need to be added to accommodate these new aircraft. Programmedhours and the current tables of maneuvers and procedures can result inrote fulfillment of the requirements necessary to pass a final test ratherthan in useful and practical training to a performance standard. Hence,the flexibility permitted under the SFAR would allow a certificate holderto develop curriculums with planned hours and specific activities includingmaneuvers and procedures, whose subject content will ensure proper trainingfor specific job tasks. Because an approved AQP will build on the presentsystem, it will be as safe or improve the safety level of the current system.Overall the FAA expects that flight crews qualified under an AQP will exhibitsuperior performance because they have received CRM training and trainingmore specific to the type of aircraft in which they perform their duties.While the SFAR would provide more flexibility in structuring curriculums,it would also require additional training in CRM and increased trainingand evaluation for second in command pilots under both Parts 121 and 135.The training and evaluation required by the SFAR would ensure that theperson is technically skilled and that the person can demonstrate thosetechnical skills while operating in a typical operational or simulatedoperational environment. The SFAR would also require continuing qualificationcurriculums for instructors and evaluators, program validation, and criteriafor determining the qualifications of all instructors and evaluators whetheror not they are employed by a certificate holder. These additional requirementsare discussed fully below.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section by Section Discussion</ITAG>The proposed SFAR has several significant features that allow for flexibilityin training programs within a standard framework and that recognize recentadvances in training methods.In accordance with proposed Section 1, the SFAR would apply only to thosecertificate holders who are required to have an approved training programunder Parts 121 or 135 and who elect to use the alternative program. TheParts 121 or 135 certificate holder must obtain approval for its AQP. TheFAA has determined that at this time a voluntary program is more appropriatethan a mandatory program because the FAA and many eligible certificateholders have limited experience with some of the levels of knowledge neededto operate new generation aircraft and with some of the newer methods andtechniques in training. In addition, advanced training devices, simulators,and hardware/software may not be immediately available to certificate holdersto meet the training and qualification requirements of an AQP. In reviewingsuch programs, the FAA will ensure that the level of safety provided byeach AQP will equal or exceed that provided by the current rules. The FAAwill also review these programs to ensure conformity with applicable internationalstandards, such as airman certification requirements, adopted by the InternationalCivil Aviation Organization.A certificate holder may elect to meet the SFAR requirements for less thanits entire aircraft fleet as explained below. Thus, a certificate holder'straining program may include curriculums that comply with current Parts121 or 135 requirements as well as curriculums which comply with the SFARrequirements. Each AQP curriculum must apply to all flight crewmember dutypositions for a particular make, model, and series aircraft (or variant)and may include other positions, such as flight attendants and aircraftdispatchers.The term ``group,'' as used in Part 121, Subparts N and O in referenceto aircraft, would not apply to advanced training approved under this SFAR.Designation of the aircraft covered by a curriculum must be by aircraftmake (e.g., Boeing, Lockheed, Cessna, etc.), model (e.g., B-747, L-1011,C-500), series (e.g., -100, -200), aircraft (or variant, as described below),and crewmember position only. More than one make, model, and series aircraftcould be included in one curriculum only if the certificate holder canshow to the satisfaction of the Administrator that the aircraft are operationallycompatible (e.g., similar handling, operating characteristics, instrumentation,and flight management). For example, a certificate holder could developa curriculum that covered both the B-757 and B-767 or two or more seriesof the same aircraft model. However, a certificate holder could not includethe DC-9 and DC-10 in the same curriculum because of the different handlingand operating characteristics of the two aircraft models. Also, a certificateholder could be required to establish a separate curriculum for a variantof a make, model, or series aircraft if aircraft within the same make,model, or series have differences that require additional knowledge, skills,and abilities to assure safe operation of the aircraft.Section 1 states that the SFAR applies to crewmembers, aircraft dispatchers,other operations personnel, instructors, and evaluators for whom trainingor qualification is required under Parts 121 or 135 under the SFAR. Althoughthe SFAR will apply to all crewmembers, aircraft dispatchers, other operationspersonnel, instructors and evaluators, at this time approval criteria isnot available for AQP curriculums for persons other than flight crewmembersand instructors and evaluators.Section 1 states that AQP curriculums may include elements of present Parts121 and 135 training programs. That is, an AQP need not be an entirelynew program. It can build on an existing approved program as long as itmeets all of the requirements of the SFAR.Section 2 of the proposed SFAR defines terms that are used throughout theSFAR.In proposed section 3, the required curriculums that the certificate holdermust include in its AQP are similar to those now covered in Part 121, SubpartsN and O, and Part 135 Subpart H except that continuing qualification isa new concept, not dealt with separately under the current regulations.In the proposed SFAR, continuing qualification includes activities suchas recurrent training, proficiency evaluations, and recency of experiencerequirements. Continuing qualification would apply to instructors and evaluatorsas well as to all crewmembers. It combines training and evaluation activitiesin both ground and flight instruction which would be planned for and conductedon a continuing qualification cycle which would be a recurring cycle. Thisrecurring cycle initially would be for a period not to exceed 26 months(which could be extended in increments of 3 months, to a maximum of 39months) during which each crewmember (or other person being trained) mustreceive a balanced mix of training and evaluation on all activities andsubjects necessary to ensure that each person maintains at least the levelof knowledge and proficiency required for original qualification. Eachcontinuing qualification cycle will include recurring training sessionsat a training facility for each person qualified under an AQP. The frequencyof these sessions will be approved by the Administrator and initially themaximum time between sessions will not exceed 13 months. A PIC must completean online evaluation in an aircraft that must occur within 30 days of eitherside of the midpoint between recurring training sessions. Once a 13-monthcalendar is tried and evaluated, extensions, not to exceed three monthsat any one approval, may be approved if warranted based upon a showingby the certificate holder that such an extension will not generally resultin the loss of skills or proficiency of crewmembers. For example, undersome of the exemptions the FAA has granted for modified training programsunder Part 121, the FAA has determined that PIC proficiency evaluationscan be given annually rather than semiannually when the PIC receives additionaltraining during the PIC's annual training session. The SFAR proposes tolimit the extensions so that no period between sessions at a training facilitycould exceed 26 months. The FAA requests comment on whether the rule shouldcontain such a limitation, and, if so, whether 26 months is appropriate.The FAA also requests comment on whether 39 months is appropriate as themaximum allowable period for a continuing qualification cycle.The qualification requirements for flight crewmembers, flight instructors,and evaluators in section 3 do not include the traditional categories oftransition training and upgrade training. These categories would not beconsidered separate categories of training since they would automaticallybe included in initial qualification for curriculums specific to aircraft,make, model, and series, or variant, and crewmember position.Section 3 also sets forth proposed evaluation requirements that are moreadvanced than current requirements because they include evaluation of theability of each flight crewmember, aircraft dispatcher, and other operationspersonnel to operate as part of a team. This type of evaluation is in additionto the traditional evaluation of an individual's skills and knowledge thatare required for performance of a particular duty assignment. It will requirethat the crewmember, aircraft dispatcher, or other operations personnelbe evaluated in an operational or operational-like setting where the personbeing evaluated must deal with typical operational distractions that mustbe dealt with at the same time that the person is performing both individualand crew tasks. For example, a pilot scenario could involve ATC communication,flight attendant communication, and exchanges between PIC and SIC all duringa typical preparation for takeoff situation.Section 3 also contains a requirement that, at the time a pilot in commandis receiving an online evaluation, the second in command and flight engineeron that same flight will also be evaluated. The purpose of evaluating theentire flight crew is to ensure that each flight crewmember performs adequatelyindividually and as part of a crew. This requirement is consistent withthe present practice of evaluating the entire flight crew when a pilotin command is receiving an online check under andSection; 121.440. However,no separate requirement is being proposed that seconds in command or flightengineers receive online evaluations, other than when associated with apilot in command evaluation.Under section 4 of the SFAR an AQP would be required to include certainadvanced methods and techniques available in training. Section 4(a) requiresCRM training and Section 4(b) requires training and evaluation to ensurethat the person is technically skilled both in his or her functional specialtyand in CRM and that the person can demonstrate those technical skills whileserving in a typical operational or simulated operational environment.These requirements are advances over the training requirements in Part121, Subparts N and O, and Part 135, Subpart H. CRM training, as it pertainsto flight crewmembers, provides them with instruction and practice andproficiency in cockpit team work. Training and evaluation of individualpiloting or other skills in an actual or simulated operational scenariocan be performed in training courses as described in andSection; 121.409.Or, under this proposal, this training and evaluation can be conductedusing other than line qualified flight crewmembers and can be accomplishedin other than the most sophisticated simulators. A certificate holder mayuse LOFT procedures to train and evaluate flight attendants, flight dispatchers,and other operations personnel.Section 4(c) requires that each qualification and continuing qualificationcurriculum include data collection procedures. These procedures must bedesigned to collect information from the certificate holder's crewmembers,instructors, and evaluators. All information would be anonymous and gearedto judging performance trends as a result of training. The kinds of informationwould include subjective evaluations on CRM and LOFT activities as wellas objective data on pass/fail rates for proficiency evaluations and onlineevaluations.The information would be used by the certificate holder and the FAA todetermine the effectiveness of an AQP curriculum. In some cases, the informationmay indicate a need to modify a curriculum or curriculum segments to meetfully the objectives of the curriculum. The information would also be usedby a certificate holder that requests a modification to its approved AQP.For example, if a certificate holder requests FAA approval for extendingintervals between recurrent training or evaluation activities under anAQP continuing qualification curriculum, the certificate holder must supportits request with collected data showing that present performance rateswarrant the extension.In addition, the data collected under AQPs would establish for the firsttime a potential data base of information from which the FAA could establishperformance norms and begin to assess systematically the relationship ofadvanced training methods and techniques with general trends in crewmemberperformance. This would allow the FAA to identify training methods andtechniques that show a high positive correlation with improved performanceand to make those methods and techniques available or mandatory, as appropriate,to other certificate holders. In this way the maximum long term benefitsof innovative training approaches can be realized.The FAA estimates that the data collection will result in a slight increasein the paperwork burden for certificate holders. Comments are invited onthe subject of data collection which will help the FAA provide guidanceto certificate holders on the kinds of data to be collected and the methodsfor collecting and analyzing data to determine the effectiveness of theAQP.Proposed section 5 deals with how persons become eligible and become certificated(commercial pilot, air transport pilot, or appropriate ratings) in an AQP.The proposed SFAR is different from the present regulations in that itwould allow an applicant for a certificate or rating to satisfy the appropriateaeronautical experience or skill requirements of Parts 61, 63, or 65 bysatisfactorily completing the appropriate training and evaluation activitiesrequired under an AQP. For example, a pilot with a commercial certificatewho sought to qualify for an airline transport pilot (ATP) certificatewould be required to meet all of the applicable requirements of Part 61except the aeronautical skills requirements of Part 61 except the aeronauticalskills requirements in andSection; 61.157. The applicant would have to satisfactorilycomplete all AQP requirements including the new requirement that the applicantwould have to show at the same time both individual technical competency(piloting and other skills) and overall crew-oriented operational competency.Thus, for example, a pilot ATP applicant would not qualify for the ATPif the applicant did not demonstrate adequate CRM skills even if the applicantsatisfactorily performed every other evaluation activity in the qualificationcurriculum.Initially, certification under an AQP would be limited to pilots who holda commercial pilot certificate with an instrument rating because the FAAhas not yet developed approval criteria to serve as a basis for obtaininga commercial pilot certificate. Until this criteria is developed the FAAwill review any certificate holder's request for commercial pilot certificationunder an AQP on a case by case basis.Proposed section 6 requires that a flight simulator or flight trainingdevice used in an AQP must be evaluated against a set of criteria establishedby the Administrator for a particular level of simulation. If the flightsimulator or flight training device meets the criteria it is approved forthat level of simulation. In addition the flight training device or flightsimulator must be approved by the Administrator for its intended use inany AQP. Thereafter, a flight simulator or flight training device wouldbe evaluated on a continuing basis. While approval of use of training devicesand simulators in a certificate holder's training program is presentlyrequired under andSection;andSection; 121.407 and 135.335, this proposal wouldfor the first time codify the policy that the flight simulator and flighttraining device qualification level approval must be to criteria establishedby the Administrator. Similarly, while initial approval and continuingqualification of simulators by the Administrator is present FAA policy,this proposal would codify that policy. The FAA has developed advisorymaterial on the approval and evaluation of flight simulators and flighttraining devices for use in AQPs. This material will appear either in theAQP advisory circular or in separate advisory circulars being developedby the National Simulator Training Staff.Proposed section 7 requires that the AQP must provide training and evaluationequivalent to all training curriculum subjects and events that are requiredunder the current rules, plus meet the additional requirements in sections3 and 4 which provide advanced training and hence a higher training, evaluation,and certification standard than the current rules require.Proposed paragraph (c) of section 7 requires each applicant that alreadyhas an approved training program under Parts 121 or 135 to submit a transitionplan (including a schedule of events) that shows how it will change itsapplicable standard training to advanced qualifications training. In otherrespects the procedural requirements of andSection;andSection; 121.405 or 135.325,as applicable, will apply (e.g., initial and final approval, appeals, stays).Paragraph (d) of section 7 addresses the situation where a certificateholder would be required to move from advanced curriculums to standardcurriculums under Parts 121 or 135 if the Administrator finds that thecertificate holder is not meeting the provisions of its approved AQP. Therevisions to an AQP will be made in accordance with the requirements ofandSection;andSection; 121.405 or 135.325, as applicable.Proposed section 8 contains requirements that would apply when a certificateholder arranges to have training performed by anyone who is not an employeeof that certificate holder. This would include training performed by anothercertificate holder or a separate organization that specializes in air carriertraining or U.S. and foreign aircraft manufacturers that provide air carriertraining. The proposed AQP includes a definition of ``training center'',the term the FAA proposes to use to describe these separate training organizations.A training center would have to obtain provisional FAA approval of eachcurriculum, curriculum segment, or portion of a curriculum segment to beused in an AQP. The draft advisory circular on AQP will contain acceptablecriteria under which a separate training organization can obtain provisionalFAA approval of a curriculum, curriculum segment, or portion of a curriculumsegment. Proposed section 8 also contains a requirement that, before atraining center's provisionally approved curriculum, curriculum segment,or portion of a curriculum segment could be used in an AQP, that use wouldhave to be approved by the Administrator. Thus, while a training centercould develop and obtain provisional approval of standard curriculums,curriculum segments, etc., before a training center could be used for AQPtraining, the certificate holder would have to satisfy the FAA that thetraining center's provisionally approved curriculum, curriculum segment,etc, fully meets that certificate holder's requirements.The proposed recordkeeping requirements in section 9 would replace thetraining and qualification recordkeeping requirements in Part 121, SubpartV and andSection; 135.63. The proposed SFAR requirements provide that thelevel of detail and the nature of the contents must be sufficient to establishthe qualification of each person who is trained and qualified under anAQP. However, the advisory circular discussed below provides specific guidanceconcerning appropriate recordkeeping.<ITAG tagnum="84">The Advisory Circular</ITAG>The FAA is issuing separately for public comment Advisory Circular 120.XXX,titled ``Advanced Qualification Program,'' which will provide guidanceon developing an AQP and specify the criteria the FAA will use to evaluatean AQP.The draft Advisory Circular identifies general indoctrination, qualification,and continuing qualification educational elements, flight training events,and activities that should be included for each. It provides guidance ondeveloping continuing qualification cycles (including training, evaluation,and currency activities) for flight crewmembers, on developing CRM segments,on flight crewmember certification, program validation, and on the approvalprocess.Since the AQP is a new concept, the AC cannot set forth exact details ofan alternate program. In keeping with the purpose of the SFAR to allowflexibility and innovation, the AC establishes a framework for developingan acceptable program and provides examples of what would be consideredacceptable practices.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Evaluation</ITAG>This regulatory evaluation examines the costs and benefits of the proposalsfor regulatory change. A full regulatory evaluation containing additionaldetail has been placed in the docket.The proposed SFAR provides an alternative means of training and qualifyingflight crewmembers. The alternative, called the Advanced QualificationProgram (AQP), would be available to any certificate holder who is requiredto have an approved training program under Parts 121 or 135 and who obtainsFAA approval for its AQP. The AQP is not mandatory; it is left up to thediscretion of the individual certificate holder as to whether to adoptthe AQP, and the FAA assumes that certificate holders will do so only ifit improves their training effectiveness and safety or is otherwise intheir economic interest. In fact, the limited available industry data suggeststhat benefits to the adopter could exceed costs. Therefore, it is assumedthat this SFAR will not impose any additional net cost on the industry.These regulations might make possible some costs savings in the air carriers'crew training program. This may occur because: (1) Training time wouldbe related to individual proficiency instead of set hours of training,and (2) the frequency of recurring training for PIC's could be reducedthereby reducing costs of transportation to training facilities.Since the AQP will build upon the current system, the FAA expects it tobe as safe as the current system, and to improve the level of safety abovethat currently required. If after evaluation by the FAA's Air Carrier TrainingBranch, the AQP is determined to provide a higher level of safety thanthe current system, the FAA may consider making it mandatory for certainclasses of operators under a future rulemaking action.The only FAA costs attributable to the proposed SFAR are the costs of establishingand operating the Air Carrier Training Branch within the FAA's WashingtonHeadquarters. This branch will assume the primary responsibility for thefinal review and analysis of air carrier training programs submitted tothe FAA for approval under the provisions of the SFAR. The staff of thisbranch will consist of a manager, and a team of 5-7 members. This branchwill also have the use of personnel on temporary short term work detailcomposed of FAA personnel from the field offices as well as headquartersstaff, and technical experts from the National Simulator Team, PrincipalOperations Inspectors (POIs) and Aircraft Evaluation Groups (AEGs). Thebranch will have secretarial and overhead support. The estimated annualcosts of this branch are $662,000.The primary benefits expected of the proposed SFAR would be a reductionof the number of air carrier accidents in which cockpit coordination problemsare the probable cause. A review of NTSB aviation accident data revealsthat during the past 20 years, there were 14 such accidents involving Part121 air carriers and 15 accidents involving Part 135 air carriers. Theseaccidents have resulted in 661 fatalities and 163 serious injuries andthe costs of these types of accidents were $779 million or about $39 milliondollars per year.Accidents in which cockpit coordination problems were the probable causeappear to have occurred at a consistent rate during the past 20 years forPart 121 departures; there were 0.83 accidents of this type per 10 millionPart 121 IFR departures. For Part 135 operators, these types of accidentsdeclined during the 70's and have been level during the 80's at 4.73 accidentsper 10 million Part 135 IFR departures. Applying accident rates to forecasteddepartures between 1989 and 1999, the projected number of Part 121 andPart 135 accidents of this type for the next 10 years are 11.9 and 21.4respectively.The economic losses due to these projected accidents would be substantial:$619.4 million due to Part 121 air carrier accidents and $71.2 milliondue to Part 135 air carrier accidents. The average annual loss during thisperiod is estimated to be $62.8 million a year. If this SFAR reduces projectedannual losses by only two percent, the reduction in losses ($1,256,000)would exceed FAA's annual costs of $662,000. The FAA expects this SFARto contribute a greater than two percent reduction in accidents in whichcockpit coordination problems were the probable cause, but at this timehas insufficient data to make a specific estimate. Accident trends willbe closely monitored during the 5-year life of the SFAR to determine theimpact of the AQP. The FAA specifically invites comments on these assumptionsregarding costs and benefits.These proposed regulations might make possible some cost savings in thelarge air carriers' training programs. The limited available informationsuggests that large Part 121 operators might have a crew training costsavings of $27,972,000 and that large Part 135 operators might have a costssavings of $4,684,950. Some training costs, however, would be increasedby this proposed SFAR. For the large Part 121 operators, it is estimatedthat some training costs would be increased by $20,667,800; for the largePart 135 operators, some of their training costs are estimated to be increasedby $591,500. Both the large Part 121 and the large Part 135 operators couldhave a net cost savings as a result of this SFAR_$7,304,000 for large Part121 operators, and $4,093,450 for large Part 135 operators. These costsavings and cost increases are explained in more detail in the regulatoryevaluation included in the docket for this NPRM, and the FAA specificallyinvites comments on the estimated cost increases and cost savings.Two benefit-cost comparisons are made in this evaluation in order to takeinto account the uncertainties regarding the effectiveness of this programat reducing accidents and the amount of participation of Parts 121 and135 operators in this program. In the first comparison, it is assumed that100 percent of the large Parts 121 and 135 operators will participate inthis program starting in the first year. It is also assumed that this programis only 20 percent effective at reducing aviation accidents caused by cockpitcrew coordination problems. This assumption is based on an arbitrary lownumber chosen to be a conservative estimate of the chief benefits of thisprogram (another benefit of this proposal would be a reduction in cockpitcrew training costs for the large operators). However, the FAA expectsthis proposed program to be more effective than 20 percent. In the secondcomparison, it is assumed that only 5 percent of the large Parts 121 and135 operators will participate in the program and that the program willonly be one percent effective at reducing the above type of accidents.The second comparison is a worst case scenario.In both comparisons, the potential benefits of the proposed program exceedthe estimated costs of the program. In the first comparison, the presentvalue of the 5-year stream of benefits is $159,979,000 which is almosttwice the present value of the 5-year stream of costs which are $82,917,000;the benefit to cost ratio is 1.93 to 1. In the second comparison, the presentvalue of the 5-year stream of benefits is $7,999,000 which also exceedsthe present value of the 5-year stream of costs which are $6,530,000; thebenefit to cost ratio is 1.22 to 1. Both of these ratios will be higherif the SFAR is more effective than 20 percent at reducing accidents causedby cockpit crew coordination problems. The FAA, therefore, determines thatthe benefits of the proposed SFAR will exceed the costs that may resultfrom it.<ITAG tagnum="84">International Trade Impact</ITAG>The proposal would have little or no impact on trade for both U.S. firmsdoing business overseas and foreign firms doing business in the UnitedStates. The proposals are likely to improve training efficiency and, therefore,reduce costs for U.S. air carriers.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Determination</ITAG>The Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (RFA) was enacted by Congress toensure that small entities are not unnecessarily and disproportionatelyburdened by government regulations. The RFA requires agencies to reviewrules which may have ``a significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small entities.''The proposals would impact those entities regulated by Parts 121 and 135.The FAA's criteria for a ``substantial number'' is a number not less than11 and which is more than one third of the small entities subject to therule. For air carriers a small entity has been defined as one who owns,but does not necessarily operate, 9 aircraft or less. The FAA's criteriafor ``a significant impact'' is at least $3,700 per year for an unscheduledcarrier and $51,800 or $92,700 per year for a scheduled carrier dependingon whether or not the fleet operated includes small aircraft (60 or fewerseats).This SFAR does not impose any costs upon Parts 121 and 135 certificateholders because the provisions in this SFAR are voluntary. It is left tothe discretion of the certificate holders as to whether they will adoptthe provisions of this SFAR. Those that do, will do so because adoptingthis SFAR will improve their operations and safety without a net increasein costs or because it is in their economic interest. The FAA believesthat the larger air carriers are most likely to adopt the provisions ofthis SFAR and that smaller air carriers might not. The smaller air carriersmight not be able to adopt the provisions in this SFAR because they donot have the necessary facilities and equipment and because of the highturnover rate of their pilots. Flight training centers might alleviatethe first problem. As a result of economies of scale, these centers couldoffer flight crew training programs that make maximum use of flight simulatorsand flight training devices at affordable rates. However, the high turnoverrate of their pilots necessitates that small air carriers concentrate theirpilot training on improving and maintaining pilot proficiency and discouragessmall air carriers from adopting the AQP.The proposed SFAR imposes no additional cost on any small Part 121 certificateholder nor any additional cost on any small Part 135 certificate holder.Therefore, the proposed amendments to 14 CFR Parts 121 and 135 will nothave a significant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act Approval</ITAG>The FAA does not have any information on the amount of increased paperworkthat this proposed SFAR would impose on those certificate holders, andothers, who voluntarily elect to apply for an AQP. Therefore, the FAA invitescomment on the issue of whether this proposal would require any potentialincrease in paperwork. In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act (Pub.L. 96-511), the record keeping and reporting provisions contained in thisnotice will be submitted for approval to the Office of Management and Budget(OMB). Comments on these requirements should be submitted to the Officeof Information and Regulatory Affairs (OMB), New Executive Office Building,Room 3001, Washington, DC 20503; Attention: FAA Desk Officer (Telephone202-395-7340). A copy should be submitted to the FAA Docket.<ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Implications</ITAG>The regulations proposed herein would not have substantial direct effectson the states, on the relationship between the national government andthe states, or on the distribution of power and responsibilities amongthe various levels of government. Thus, in accordance with Executive Order12612, it is determined that such a regulation does not have federalismimplications warranting preparation of a Federalism Assessment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Conclusion</ITAG>For the reasons stated under the heading ``Regulatory Evaluation,'' theFAA has determined that this document involves a proposed regulation which:(1) Is not a major rule under Executive Order 12291; and (2) is a significantrule under Department of Transportation Regulatory Policies and Procedures(44 FR 11034; February 26, 1979). Also, for the reasons stated under theheading ``Trade Impact Statement and Regulatory Flexibility Determination,''I certify that the proposed rule will not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. A copy of the full regulatoryevaluation may be obtained by contacting the person identified above underthe caption <T2>``FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT.''</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>14 CFR Part 61Air safety, Air transportation, Aviation safety, Safety.14 CFR Part 63Air Safety, Air transportation, Airmen, Aviation safety, Safety, Transportation.14 CFR Part 65Airman, Aviation safety, Air transportation, Aircraft.14 CFR Part 121Aircraft pilots, Airmen, Aviation safety, Pilots, Safety.14 CFR Part 135Air carriers, Air transportation, Airmen, Aviation safety, Safety, Pilots.<ITAG tagnum="84">Proposed Amendment</ITAG>Accordingly, the FAA proposes to amend Parts 61, 63, 65, 121, and 135 ofthe Federal Aviation Regulations (14 CFR Parts 61, 63, 65, 121, and 135)as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 61_CERTIFICATION: PILOTS AND FLIGHT INSTRUCTORS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 61 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1354(a), 1355, 1421, 1422, and 1427; 49 U.S.C.106(g) [Revised, Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983].</ITAG>2. In Part 61 the table of contents is amended by adding a note for SFARNo. XX to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">SFAR NO. XX [Note]</ITAG>3. A section for Special Federal Aviation Regulations is added to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">SFAR No. XX</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4> For the text of SFAR No. XX, see Part 121 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 63_CERTIFICATION: FLIGHT CREWMEMBERS OTHER THAN PILOTS</ITAG>4. An authority citation for Part 63 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1354, 1355, 1421, 1422, and 1427; 49.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Table of Contents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 1. Introduction and Definitions: Advanced Qualification Program(AQP)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 1. Introduction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">1. Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">2. Background</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">3. Acceptable Method of Compliance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">4. Applicability</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">5. Hazardous Materials and Security</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">6.-9. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 2. Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">10. Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 3. Training Facilities and Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">11. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">12. FAA Approval of Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">13. FAA Approval of Flight Training Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">14.-19. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 2. Overview: Components of an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 1. Required Curriculums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">20. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">21. Types of Curriculums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">22. General Indoctrination</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">23. Qualification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">24. Continued Qualification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 2. Structure of an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">25. Curriculums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">26. Curriculum Segments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">27. Training, Testing, and Currency Modules</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">28. Developing Modules</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">29. Special Curriculum Segments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">30. Temporary Special Curriculum Segment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">31. Illustration of AQP Structure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">32.-39. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 3. Additional Components of an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">40. Cockpit Resource Management (CRM) and Line Oriented Flight Training(LOFT)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">41. Facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">42. Training Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">43. Identification of Flight Training Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">44. Courseware</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">45. Experience Level of Instructors and Evaluators</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">46. Aircraft Fleet and Fleet Mix</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">47. Operating Environment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">48. Certificate Holder's History</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">49. Proposed Continued Qualification Schedule</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">50. Certificate Holder's Program Evaluation Plan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">51. Data Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">52. International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">53.-59. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 3. General Indoctrination Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">60. Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">61. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">62. Certificate Holder Specific Indoctrination</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">63. Duty Position-Specific Indoctrination</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">64.-69. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 4. Qualification Curriculums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 1. Introduction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">70. Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">71. Planned Hours</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">72. Differences Training</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">73. Sample Qualification Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 2. Pilot and Flight Engineers Ground Qualification Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">74. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">75. General Operational Subjects</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">76. Aircraft Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">77. Aircraft System Integration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">78. Emergency Drill Training</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 3. Pilot and Flight Engineers Flight Qualification Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">79. General Guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">80. Approved Use of Flight Training Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">81. Level 4_Flight Training Device</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">82. Level 5_Flight Training Device</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">83. Level 6_Flight Training Device</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">84. Level 7_Flight Training Device</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">85. Level A Flight Simulator</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">86. Level B Flight Simulator</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">87. Level C Flight Simulator</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">88. Level D Flight Simulator</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">89. Tables of Instruction/Evaluation Events which Apply to Pilotsof Land and Sea Airplanes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 5. Continued Qualification Curriculums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 1. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">90. Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">91. Application</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 2. Continued Qualification Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">92. Types of Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">93. Recurrent Ground Instruction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">94. Recurrent Flight Proficiency Instruction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">95. Line Oriented Flight Training</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">96. Flight Crewmember Currency Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">97. Flight Proficiency Evaluations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">98. Online Evaluations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 3. Continued Qualification Cycles</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">99. Level of Detail</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">100. Establishing Periodic Limits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">101. Schedule Divisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 4. Scheduling and Requalification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">102. Extended Scheduling Time</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">103. Flight Crewmember Requalification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">104.-112. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 6. Recordkeeping and Data Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">113. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 1. Records on Qualified Individuals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">114. Recordkeeping Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">115. Basic Record Contents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">116. Training and Qualification Records</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">117. Retention of Records</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">118. Guidelines for Computerized Recordkeeping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">119.-123. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 2. Data Collection for Evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">124. Evaluation Plan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">125. Data Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">126. Kinds of Data to be Collected</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">127.-130. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 7. Airman Certification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">131. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">132. Practical Test Criteria</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">133. Completion of Qualification Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">134. Demonstration of Individual Skills</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">135. Authorized Evaluation Personnel</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">136. Disposition of Airman Certification Documents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">137.-140. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 8. Training and Evaluation of Instructors and Evaluators</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">141. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">142. Training and Evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">143. Instructor Courses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">144. Evaluator Training and Evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">145. CRM Training and Evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">146.-150. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 9. Training Centers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">151. Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">152. General Guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">153. Application for Provisional Approval of Training Center CurriculumMaterial </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">154. Approval for Use in an AQP </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">155.-160. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 10. Computer Based Instructional/Evaluation Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">161. Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">162. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">163. Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">164.-170. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 11. Qualification of Flight Simulators and Flight TrainingDevices for Use in an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 1. Approval of Training Devices and Simulators</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">171. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">172. Criteria for Flight Simulator and Flight Training Device InitialQualification Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">173. Initial Approval of Flight Simulators and Flight Training Devicesfor Use in an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">174. Currently Qualified Devices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">175. Other Devices, Not Currently Qualified</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 2. Continuing Qualification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">176. Maintaining Qualification of Simulators and Training Devices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">177. Failure to Maintain Initial Qualification Level</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">178. Component Inoperative Guide</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">179. Responsibility of Sponsor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">180. Scheduled Recurrent Evaluations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">181. Time Periods for Scheduled Recurrent Evaluations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">182. No-Notice Evaluations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">183. Change of Qualification Status</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">184. Discrepancies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">185.-195. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 12. Role of the Air Carrier Training Branch</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">196. Purpose and Responsibilities of the Air Carrier Training Branch</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">197. Technical Assistance to the Staff</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">198. Application for Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">199.-205. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Chapter 13. Approval Process for an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 1. General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">206. The Approval Process</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">207. Initiating the Process</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">208.-210. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 2. Developing an AQP and Initial Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">211. FAA Guidance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">212. Submission of an AQP Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">213. General Format</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">214. Supporting Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">215. Review of Documents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">216. Delays</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">217. New Air Operators</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">218. Method of Granting Initial or Provisional Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">219. Method of Denying Initial or Provisional Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">220. Expiration Dates for Initial or Provisional Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">221. Withdrawal of Initial Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">222.-230. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 3. Final Approval Process</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">231. Evaluating Initially Approved Curriculums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">232. Final Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">233.-240. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Section 4. Continuing Evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">241. Continuing Evaluation Plan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">242. Revisions to an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">243. Withdrawal of Approval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">244. Appeal of a Withdrawal</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">245. Expiration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">246.-255. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">List of Tables and Illustrations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Figure 2-1 Structural Units of an AQP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Figure 3-1 Sample of a General Indoctrination Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Figure 4-1 Sample of a Qualification Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Tables Flight Instruction/Evaluation Land Airplanes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Special Purpose Additional Events</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Water Operations/Events</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Flight Instruction/Evaluation Flight Engineers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Figure 5-1 Sample of a Continued Qualification Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Figure 5-2 Continuing Qualification Schedule</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">U.S.C. 106(g) (revised, Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>5. In Part 63 the table of contents is amended by adding a note for SFARNo. XX to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">SFAR No. XX [Note]</ITAG>6. A section for Special Federal Aviation Regulations is added to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">SFAR No. XX</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>For the text of SFAR No. XX, see Part 121 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 65_CERTIFICATION: AIRMEN OTHER THAN FLIGHT CREWMEMBERS</ITAG>7. The authority citation for Part 65 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1354(a), 1355, 1421, 1422, and 1427; 49 U.S.C.106(g) (revised, Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>8. In Part 65 the table of contents is amended by adding a note for SFARNo. XX to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">SFAR No. XX [Note]</ITAG>9. A section for Special Federal Aviation Regulations is added to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">SFAR No. XX</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>For the text of SFAR No. XX, see Part 121 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 121_CERTIFICATION AND OPERATIONS: DOMESTIC, FLAG, AND SUPPLEMENTALAIR CARRIERS AND COMMERCIAL OPERATORS OF LARGE AIRCRAFT</ITAG>10. The authority citation for Part 121 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1354(a), 1355, 1356, 1357, 1401, 1421-1430,1472, 1485, and 1502; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) [Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January12, 1983].</ITAG>11. In Part 121 the table of contents of Special Federal Aviation Regulationsis amended by adding a reference to SFAR No. XX to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">SFAR No. XX</ITAG>12. In Part 121 the section of Special Federal Aviation Regulations isamended, by adding SFAR No. XX to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Special Federal Aviation Regulation No. XX_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Advanced Qualification Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1. Purpose and eligibility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2. Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3. Required Curriculums.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4. Other Requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">5. Certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">6. Flight training devices and flight simulators.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7. Approval of Advanced Qualification Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">8. Approval of Training, Qualification, or Evaluation by a TrainingCenter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">9.  Recordkeeping requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">10. Expiration.</ITAG>Contrary provisions of Parts 61, 63, 65, 121, and 135 of the Federal AviationRegulations nowwithstanding_1. Purpose and Eligibility(a) This Special Federal Aviation Regulation provides for approval of analternate method (known as ``Advanced Qualification Program'' or ``AQP'')for qualifying, training, certifying, and otherwise ensuring competencyof crewmembers, aircraft dispatchers, other operations personnel, instructors,and evaluators who are required to be trained or qualified under Parts121 and 135 of the FAR or under this SFAR.(b) A certificate holder is eligible under this Special Federal AviationRegulation if the certificate holder is required to have an approved trainingprogram under andSection;andSection; 121.401 or 135.341.(c) A certificate holder obtains approval of each proposed curriculum underthis AQP as specified in section 8 of this SFAR.(d) A curriculum approved under the AQP may include elements of presentParts 121 and Part 135 training programs. Each curriculum must specifythe make, model, and series aircraft (or variant) and each crewmember positionor other positions to be covered by that curriculum. Positions to be coveredby the AQP must include all flight crewmember positions, instructors, andevaluators and may include other positions, such as flight attendants,aircraft dispatchers, and other operations personnel.(e) Each certificate holder that obtains approval of an AQP under thisSFAR shall comply with all of the requirements of that program.2. DefinitionsAs used in this SFAR:``Curriculum'' means a portioin of an AQP that covers one of three programareas, general indoctrination training, qualification training, and continuingqualification training. A qualification or continuing qualification curriculumaddresses the required training and qualification for a specific make,model, and series aircraft (or variant) and for a specific duty position.``Evaluator'' means a person who meets and maintains all of the qualificationsunder the AQP for an instructor who has been designated by the certificateholder and approved by the Administrator to evaluate the performance ofcrewmembers, instructors, other evaluators, aircraft dispatchers, and otheroperations personnel.``Facility'' means all of the classrooms, equipment, and materials thatare needed for training.``Training center'' means an independent organization that provides trainingunder contract or other arrangement to certificate holders. A trainingcenter may be a certificate holder that provides training to another certificateholder, an aircraft manufacturer that provides training to certificateholders, or any non-certificate holder that provides training to a certificateholder.``Variant'' means that there are differences between aircraft within thesame make, model, or series which are determined by the FAA to be of suchan extent to require that a flight crewmember obtain additional knowledge,skills, and abilities to ensure safe operation of the aircraft.3. Required CurriculumsEach AQP must have separate curriculums for the following:(a) <T3>General Indoctrination Curriculums. </T3>General indoctrination curriculumsmust include:(1) For newly hired persons being trained under an AQP: Company policiesand practices and general operational knowledge.(2) For newly hired flight crewmembers and aircraft dispatchers: Generalaeronautical knowledge.(3) For instructors: Methods and theories of instruction; and the knowledgenecessary to use aircraft, flight training devices, and flight simulatorsin advanced qualification curriculums.(4) For evaluators: Evaluation requirements specified in each approvedcurriculum; methods of evaluating crewmembers and dispatchers; and policiesand practices used to conduct ground and flight evaluations particularto an advanced qualification curriculum.(b) <T3>Qualification curriculums. </T3>Qualification curriculums must includethe following:(1) The certificate holder's planned hours of ground instruction, flightinstruction (flight simulator or flight training device instruction, orinflight instruction), and evaluation.(2) A list of and text describing the training, qualification, and certificationactivities, as applicable for specific positions subject to the AQP, asfollows:(i) <T3>Crewmembers and dispatchers. </T3>Appropriate training, evaluation,and certification activities which are aircraft- and equipment-specificto qualify a person for a particular duty position on, or duties relatedto the operation of a specific make, model, and series aircraft (or variant);a list of and text describing the knowledge requirements, subject materials,job skills, and each maneuver and procedure to be trained and evaluated;the practical test requirements in addition to or in place of the requirementsof Parts 61, 63, and 65; and a list of and text describing supervised operatingexperience.(ii) <T3>Instructors. </T3>Appropriate training and evaluation to qualify apilot or flight engineer to instruct on a particular make, model, and seriesaircraft (or variant).(iii) <T3>Evaluators. </T3>Appropriate training and evaluation to qualify aninstructor pilot or flight engineer instructor to evaluate on a particularmake, model, and series aircraft (or variant).(c) <T3>Continuing qualification curriculums. </T3>Continuing qualificationcurriculums must include the following:(1) A recurring cycle not exceeding 26 months that ensures that duringeach cycle each person qualified under an AQP will receive a balanced mixof training and evaluation on all events and subjects necessary to ensurethat each person maintains at least the level of knowledge and proficiencyrequired for original qualification. The Administrator may approve extensionsof the continuing qualification cycle, in increments not exceeding 3 months,up to a maximum of 39 months upon demonstration by a certificate holderthat an extension is warranted. The continuing qualification cycle mustinclude recurring training sessions at a training facility for each personqualified under an AQP. The frequency of these sessions must be approvedby the Administrator. Initially, the frequency of these recurring sessionsmay not exceed 13 months. Thereafter, upon demonstration by a certificateholder that an extension is warranted, the Administrator may approve anextension of the period between sessions in increments not exceeding 3months up to a maximum of 26 months. A recurring training session thatoccurs any time during the two months before the last date for a requiredtraining session can be considered by the certificate holder to be completedin the last month.(2) Each continuing qualification curriculum must include a curriculumsegment that covers the requirements for requalifying a crewmember, aircraftdispatcher, or other operations personnel who has not maintained continuingqualification.(3) Continuing qualification must include recurring instruction in allevents and major subjects required for original qualification, and recencyof experience activities, as follows:(i) For pilots in command, seconds in command, flight engineers, and instructorsand evaluators: Ground instruction including a general review of knowledgeand skills covered in qualification training, updated information on newlydeveloped procedures, and safety information.(ii) For pilots in command, seconds in command, flight engineers, instructors,and evaluators who conduct their duties in flight: Appropriate proficiencyinstruction in an aircraft, flight training device, or flight simulatoron normal, abnormal, and emergency flight procedures and maneuvers.(iii) For instructors and evaluators who are limited to conducting theirduties in flight simulators and flight training devices: Appropriate proficiencyinstruction in a flight training device or flight simulator on normal,abnormal, and emergency flight procedures and maneuvers.(iv) For pilots in command and seconds in command, recency of experiencerequirements in accordance with andSection; 121.439.(4) Continuing qualification must also include evaluation in all eventsand major subjects required for original qualification, as follows:(i) For pilots in command, seconds in command, and flight engineers: Aproficiency evaluation, appropriate portions of which may be conductedin an aircraft, flight simulator, or flight training device as approvedin the certificate holder's curriculum which must be completed during eachrecurring training session.(ii) For pilots in command: An online evaluation conducted in an aircraftduring the actual flight operations under Parts 121 or 135 or during operationally(line) oriented flights, such as ferry flights or proving flights. An onlineevaluation in an aircraft must be completed within 30 days of either sideof the midpoint between recurring training sessions.(iii) During the online evaluations required under paragraph (ii) above,each person performing duties as a pilot in command, second in command,or flight engineer for that flight, must be individually evaluated to determinewhether he or she: (1) Remains adequately trained and currently proficientwith respect to the particular aircraft, crew position, and type of operationin which he or she serves; and (2) has the skills and ability to operateeffectively as part of a crew.(iv) For any other persons covered by an AQP a means to evaluate performanceof their duties in their assigned tasks in an operational setting.<T3>4. Other Requirements.  </T3>In addition to the requirements of section 3, each AQP qualification andcontinuing qualification curriculum must meet the following requirements: (a) Each curriculum must include Cockpit Resource Management (CRM) Trainingappropriate to each position for which training is provided under an AQP.Acceptable criteria for CRM training are set forth in AC 120.XXX, ``CockpitResource Management Training.''  (b) Each curriculum must include training and evaluation that is designedto instruct and evaluate the skills and proficiency of each person beingtrained under an AQP to use their cockpit resource management skills andtheir technical (piloting or other) skills in an actual or simulated operationsscenario. For flight crewmembers this training and evaluation must be conductedin an approved flight training device or flight simulator. Acceptable criteriafor this training are set forth in AC 120-XXX, ``Line Oriented Flight Training.'' (c) Each qualification and continuing qualification curriculum must includedata collection procedures that will ensure that the certificate holdercollects information from its crewmembers, instructors, and evaluatorsthat will enable the FAA to determine whether the training and evaluationsare working to accomplish the overall objectives of the curriculum. Acceptablecriteria for data collection are set forth in AC 120.XXX, ``Advanced QualificationPrograms.''  <T3>5. Certification  </T3>A person enrolled in an AQP is eligible to receive a commercial or airlinetransport pilot, flight engineer, or aircraft dispatcher certificate orappropriate rating based on the successful completion of training and evaluationevents accomplished under that program if the following requirements aremet:  (a) Training and evaluation of required maneuvers and procedures underthe AQP must meet minimum certification and rating criteria establishedby the Administrator to be accepted as a substitute for the practical testrequirements of Part 61, 63, or 65, as applicable. Acceptable criteria,including acceptable maneuvers and procedures, for meeting this requirementare set forth in AC 120.XXX, ``Advanced Qualification Programs.''  (b) The applicant must satisfactorily complete the appropriate qualificationcurriculum.  (c) The applicant must show competence in required technical skills (e.g.piloting) and cockpit resource management skills in scenarios that testboth types of knowledge and skills together.  (d) The person is otherwise eligible under the applicable requirementsof Part 61, 63, or 65.  <T3>6. Flight Training Devices and Flight Simulators  </T3>(a) <T3>Eligibility to use flight training devices and flight simulators. </T3>Eachperson who wishes to use a flight training device or flight simulator inan AQP must request the Administrator to conduct an evaluation of the flighttraining device or flight simulator for assignment of a qualification levelfor the device to be used in crewmember training, evaluation, or certification.To be eligible for this approval, the applicant must_ (1) Hold an operating certificate; or(2) Be a training center authorized by the Administrator to conduct flightcrewmember training or qualification under an AQP.(b) <T3>Initial qualification.</T3> Each flight training device or flight simulatorto be used by a certificate holder or a training center in advanced qualificationtraining must_ (1) Be, or have been, evaluated against a set of criteria established bythe Administrator for a particular qualification level of simulation, andif it meets the criteria, be approved for that qualification level of simulation;and  (2) Be approved for its intended use in a specified AQP.  (c) <T3>Continuing qualification. </T3>Each flight training device or flightsimulator to be used in an AQP must be part of a flight simulator or flighttraining device continuing qualification program approved by the Administrator. <T3>7. Approval of Advanced Qualification Program  </T3>(a) <T3>Approval process. </T3>Each applicant for approval of an AQP curriculumunder this SFAR shall apply for approval of that curriculum. Applicationfor approval is made to the Certificate Holder's FAA Flight Standards DistrictOffice.  (b) <T3>Approval criteria. </T3>An application for approval of an AQP curriculumwill be approved if the program meets the following requirements:  (1) It must be submitted in a form and manner acceptable to the Administrator. (2) It must meet all of the requirements of this SFAR.  (3) It must indicate specifically the requirements of Part 61, 63, 65,121 or 135, as applicable, that would be replaced by an AQP curriculum.Each applicable requirement of Part 61, 63, 65, 121 or 135 that is notspecifically addressed in an AQP curriculum continues to apply to the certificateholder.  (c) <T3>Application and transition. </T3>Each certificate holder that appliesfor one or more advanced qualification curriculums or for a revision toa previously approved curriculum must comply with andSection;andSection;121.405or 135.325, as applicable, and must include as part of its applicationa proposed transition plan (containing a calendar of events) for movingfrom its present approved training to the advanced qualification training.     (d) <T3>Advanced qualification program revisions or rescissions of approval.</T3>If after a certificate holder begins operations under an AQP, the Administratorfinds that the certificate holder is not meeting the provisions of itsapproved AQP, the Administrator may require the certificate holder to makerevisions in accordance with andSection;andSection;121.405 or 135.325, as applicable,or to submit a plan (containing a schedule of events) under which it wouldtransition to an approved Parts 121 or 135 training program, as appropriate.8. Approval of Training, Qualification, or Evaluation by a Training Center(a) A certificate holder under Parts 121 or 135 may arrange to have AQPrequired training, qualification, or evaluation functions performed byanother person (a ``training center'') if the following requirements aremet:(1) The training center's training and qualification curriculums, curriculumsegments, or portions of curriculum segments must be provisionally approvedby the Administrator. Application for approval must be made to the FAA'sFlight Standards District Office that has responsibility for the trainingcenter.(2) The specific use of provisionally approved curriculums, curriculumsegments, or portions of curriculum segments in a certificate holder'sAQP must be approved by the Administrator as set forth in section 7(a)of this SFAR.(b) An applicant for provisional approval of a curriculum, curriculum segment,or portion of a curriculum segment under this paragraph must show thatthe following requirements are met:(1) The applicant must have an approved curriculum for the qualificationand continuing qualification of each instructor or evaluator employed bythe applicant.(2) The applicant's facilities must be found by the Administrator to beadequate for any planned training, qualification, or evaluation for a Parts121 or 135 certificate holder.(3) The curriculum, curriculum segment, or portion of a curriculum segmentmust (unless it is general indoctrination) identify the specific make,model, and series aircraft (or variant) and crewmember position for whichit is designed.(c) A certificate holder who wants approval to use a training center'sprovisionally approved curriculum, curriculum segment, or portion of acurriculum segment in its AQP, must show that the following requirementsare met:(1) Each instructor or evaluator used by the training center must meetall of the qualification and continuing qualification requirements thatapply to employees of the certificate holder that has arranged for thetraining, including knowledge of the certificate holder's operations.(2) Each provisionally approved curriculum, curriculum segment, or portionof a curriculum segment must be approved by the Administrator for use inthe certificate holder's AQP. The Administrator will either provide approvalor require modifications to ensure that each curriculum, curriculum segment,or portion of a curriculum segment is applicable to the certificate holder'sAQP.9. Recordkeeping RequirementsEach certificate holder shall show that it will establish and maintainrecords in sufficient detail to establish the training, qualification,and certification of each person qualified under an AQP in accordance withthe training, qualification, and certification requirements of this SFAR.10. ExpirationThis Special Federal Aviation Regulation terminates on (date 5 years aftereffective date) unless sooner terminated.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 135_AIR TAXI OPERATORS AND COMMERCIAL OPERATORS</ITAG>13. The authority citation for Part 135 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1354(a), 1355(a), 1421 through 1431, and1502; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) [Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983].</ITAG>14. In Part 135 the table of contents of Special Federal Aviation Regulationsis amended by adding a reference to SFAR No. XX to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">SFAR No. XX [Note]</ITAG>15. The section of Special Federal Aviation Regulations is amended, byadding SFAR No. XX [Note] to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">SPECIAL FEDERAL AVIATION REGULATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">SFAR No. XX</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> For the text of SFAR No. XX, see Part 121 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC, on February 15, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Daniel C. Beaudette,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Flight Standards Service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix_Advanced Qualification Program Advisory Circular Draft</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> This Appendix will not appear in the Code of Federal Regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[A/C XX-XXX]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 1. Introduction And Definitions: Advanced Qualification Program(AQP)</ITAG>Section 1. Introduction<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Purpose</ITAG>This advisory circular provides Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) guidancefor approval of an Advanced Qualification Program (AQP) under Special FederalAviation Regulation XX. An AQP is an alternate means of qualifying, training,certifying, and otherwise ensuring the competency of pilots, crewmembers,aircraft dispatchers, instructors, evaluators, and other operations personnelsubject to the training and evaluation requirements of FAR Parts 121 and135. The goal of any AQP is to encourage innovation in instructional methodologyand technology and to encourage efficient management of training systemsin order to achieve the highest possible standards of individual and crewperformance without unduly increasing the cost of maintaining trainingresources. An objective of all AQPs is to provide more effective trainingand the means to enhance professional qualifications to a level above thatpresently provided for by the minimum standards specified in Parts 121and 135.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Background</ITAG>The training program and crewmember qualification requirements of SubpartsN and O of FAR Part 121 have not changed significantly since 1970. However,the capabilities and use of simulators and other computer based trainingdevices in training and qualification activities have changed dramaticallyin the intervening years. SFAR XX and this Advisory Circular allow certificateholders subject to the training and evaluation requirements of Parts 121and 135 to develop innovative training and qualification programs thatincorporate the most recent advances in training methods and techniques.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Acceptable method of compliance</ITAG>The methods and procedures in this Advisory Circular describe one acceptablemeans of compliance with SFAR XX. Alternate means proposed by an applicantwill be given due consideration.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Aplicability</ITAG>Any certificate holder required to have an approved training program underandSection;andSection;121.401(a)(1) or 135.341 is eligible to conduct someor all of its training (except hazardous materials and security training)under an approved AQP. Each approved AQP curriculum covers a certificateholder's training, qualification, and evaluation activities for all flightcrewmember duty positions, as well as instructors and evaluators, for aparticular make, model, and series (and variants within series) aircraft.An AQP curriculum may be approved for flight attendants, aircraft dispatchers,and other operations personnel. A certificate holder's AQP may includecurriculums that comply with current Parts 121 or 135 requirements as wellas SFAR requirements. To receive approval for an AQP a certificate holdermust have the facilities and equipment necessary to support the training,evaluation, certification, and other competency activities which are providedfor in the AQP. Certificate holders may use third party training organizations(described as training centers in this A/C) to provide portions of thetraining, qualification, and evaluation activities which are part of anapproved AQP. A certificate holder who chooses to use an AQP must conductunder the AQP all its training, qualification, and evaluation activities(except hazardous materials and security training) for all flight crewmemberduty positions for particular make, model, and series aircraft (or variant).<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Hazardous materials and security training</ITAG>An AQP is not applicable to security training for crewmembers under FARandSection;andSection; 121.417(b)(3)(v) and 135.331(b)(3)(v) or to hazardousmaterials training under andSection;andSection;121.443a and 135.333. Hazardousmaterials training requirements in andSection;121.443a already reflect thecontent approach of the SFAR. Specific requirements for security trainingare specified in each Air Carrier's Standard Security Program (ACSSP).An ACSSP is required by FAR Part 108 and may be amended by the Administratorin accordance with andSection;108.25. Approval for training in hazardousmaterials must be coordinated with the Office of Hazardous Materials ofthe Research and Special Programs Administration (RSPA) (DOT). Approvalfor training in security must be coordinated with the Office of Civil AviationSecurity (FAA).<ITAG tagnum="81">6.-9. Reserved</ITAG>Section 2. Definitions<ITAG tagnum="81">10. Definitions</ITAG>The following terms are used throughout this AC and are defined as follows:<T3>AQP. </T3>Advanced Qualification Program, a program for qualifyingair operator personnel which includes curriculums, facilities, instructors,evaluators, courseware, instructional delivery methods, and testing andevaluating procedures.<T3>Courseware. </T3>Instructional material developed for each curriculum.This is the information in lesson plans, flight event descriptions, computersoftware programs, audiovisual programs, workbooks, and handouts.<T3>Curriculum. </T3>A portion of an AQP that covers one of three programareas: (1) General indoctrination, (2) qualification, and (3) continuedqualification. A qualification or continued qualification curriculum addressesthe required training and qualification activities for a specific make,model, and series aircraft (or variant) and for a specific duty position.<T3>Curriculum segment. </T3>An integral part of a curriculum which canbe separately evaluated and individually approved but by itself does notqualify a person for a duty position.<T3>Duty Position. </T3>The functional or operating position of a crewmember,aircraft dispatcher or other person. For Parts 121 and 135 operations,duty positions include Pilot-in-Command (PIC), Second-in-Command (SIC),Flight Engineer (FE), Flight Attendant (FA), Flight Navigator (NAV), AircraftDispatcher (AD), Instructor (IN), and Evaluator (EV).<T3>Element. </T3>An integral part of a training or evaluation module thatis not task-oriented but subject-oriented. For example, elements of anaircraft ground training module titled ``Electrical Power'' may be: DCPower system, AC Power system, circuit protection, etc.<T3>Evaluation. </T3>The method by which individuals demonstrate the requiredlevel of knowledge in a subject and whether they can apply knowledge andskills learned in instructional situations to practical situations.<T3>Evaluator. </T3>A person who meets and maintains all of the qualificationsunder the AQP for an instructor who has been designated by the certificateholder and approved by the Administrator to evaluate the performance ofcrewmembers, instructors, other evaluators, aircraft dispatchers, and otheroperations personnel.<T3>Event. </T3>An integral part of a training or evaluation module whichis task-oriented and requires the use of a specific procedure.<T3>Facility. </T3>All of the classrooms, equipment, and materials thatare needed for qualification.<T3>Instructional delivery methods. </T3>Methodology for conveying informationto a student; for example, lectures, demonstrations, audiovisual presentations,home study assignments, workshops, and drills. Training devices, simulators,aircraft, and computer work stations are also instructional delivery methods.<T3>Line Oriented Flight Training (Loft). </T3>LOFT is training conductedusing operational oriented flight scenarios that accurately replicate interactionwithin a flight crew and between flight crew members and dispatch facilities,other crewmembers, ATC, and ground operations. These simulations are conductedfor training and evaluation purposes and include random, abnormal and emergencyoccurrences.<T3>Training center. </T3>An independent organization that provides trainingunder contract or other arrangement to certificate holders. A trainingcenter may be a certificate holder that provides training to another certificateholder, an aircraft manufacturer that provides training to certificateholders, or any non-certificate holder that provides training to a certificateholder.<T3>Training hours. </T3>The total amount of time (in hours, as specifiedin a curriculum segment outline) that it takes to complete the trainingrequired by a curriculum segment including instruction, demonstration,practice, and evaluation as appropriate.<T3>Training or evaluation module. </T3>An integral part of a curriculumsegment which contains descriptive information, elements, or events whichrelate to a specific subject. For example, a B-727 ground training curriculumsegment would have a training module for aircraft systems which would becomposed of elements (hydraulics, pneumatics, electronics, etc.). As anotherexample, the curriculum segment on flight training would have traininga module for procedures composed of events (normal, abnormal, emergency,etc.).<T3>Variant. </T3>Differences between aircraft within the same make, model,or series which are determined by the FAA to be of such an extent to requirethat a flight crewmember obtain additional knowledge, skills, and abilitiesto ensure safe operation of the aircraft.Section 3. Training Facilities and Equipment<ITAG tagnum="81">11. General</ITAG>Each organization authorized to participate in an AQP will have the facilities,equipment, and courseware necessary to support the kinds of training, evaluation,and currency activities which are provided for in the AQP. Examples offacilities include classrooms, self-paced learning stations, breakrooms,recordkeeping facilities, etc. Examples of equipment include computer basicinstructional equipment and home study equipment. Examples of coursewareinclude lesson plans, flight maneuver packages, audiovisual programs, workbooks,CBI computer courseware, etc.<ITAG tagnum="81">12. FAA Approval of Equipment</ITAG>With the exception of flight simulators, flight training devices, and computerbased instructional equipment and materials, formal FAA approval is neitherrequired nor granted for each facility or piece of equipment used in AQPs.However, procedures for use of computer based learning stations, home studyequipment, and all other facilities and equipment should be establishedin writing by the organization responsible for security, maintenance, andemployment of the particular item. (For detailed guidance on computer-basedinstructional/evaluation equipment, see Chapter 10.)<ITAG tagnum="81">13. FAA approval of flight training equipment</ITAG>Flight training equipment includes aircraft, flight training devices, flightsimulators, and any devices used to enable flight simulation. For example,inflight simulation equipment includes devices which provide for simulatedinstrument readings while in flight and electronic vision restricting equipment.The FAA must approve simulation equipment which is interactive with anyaircraft system before that equipment is used in flight. Flight trainingdevices, flight simulators, and inflight simulation equipment must be evaluatedand found satisfactory by the National Simulator Program Manager. Inflightequipment may require approval by the appropriate FAA Aircraft CertificationOffice (AC) staff. After the National Simulator Program Manager determinesthat the equipment is satisfactory, the FAA may approve its use withinan AQP. (For further information on approval and maintenance of flightsimulators and flight training devices see Chapter 11.)<ITAG tagnum="81">14.-19. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 2. Overview: Components of an AQP </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">20. General </ITAG>Submissions of an AQP for FAA approval should include several components.Some of these components are specifically required by SFAR XX and someare recommended here as an acceptable method of complying with the intentof SFAR XX. These components are summarized in Sections 1-3 of this chapter.Some are discussed in greater detail in referenced chapters. Hazardousmaterials training and security training are not at this time covered underan AQP. These two types of training will continue to be covered under theapplicable provisions of Parts 108, 121, and 135. Section 1. Required Curriculum <ITAG tagnum="81">21. Types of Curriculums </ITAG>AQPs usually have at least the following curriculums: General Indoctrination,Qualification, and Continued Qualification. Each AQP qualification andcontinued qualification curriculum is comprised of training activities,evaluation activities, and currency activities (such as takeoffs and landings,instrument approach procedures, and other flight operations) that are necessaryto establish and maintain acceptable levels of competency for operationalpersonnel. <ITAG tagnum="81">22. General indoctrination </ITAG>General indoctrination occurs for all newly hired persons who require trainingunder an AQP and covers company policies and practices as well as generaloperational knowledge. For newly hired flight crewmembers and aircraftdispatchers general indoctrination also covers general aeronautical knowledgeand requires development of a general indoctrination curriculum for eachduty position (i.e. Pilot in Command, Second in Command, and Aircraft Dispatcher).Instructor indoctrination focuses on methods and theories of instructionand the knowledge necessary to use aircraft, flight training devices, andflight simulators and other training facilities and equipment as learningmedia in AQPs. Evaluator indoctrination focuses on the evaluation requirementsspecified in each approved curriculum, methods of evaluating crewmembers,dispatchers, instructors and other evaluators, and policies and practicesused to conduct ground and flight evaluations particular to an AQP. <ITAG tagnum="81">23. Qualification </ITAG>Qualification prepares crewmembers, dispatchers, instructors, and evaluatorsto competently perform the tasks assigned by the certificate holder toeach duty position. A qualification curriculum is aircraft and duty positionspecific. It is comprised of ground training, flight simulator training,flight training device training, inflight training, and any required supervisedoperating experience. It also includes written, oral, and practical evaluations.A qualification curriculum must include the certificate holder's plannedhours of ground instruction and flight instruction (flight simulation orflight training device instruction, or inflight instruction) and evaluation.After successfully completing general indoctrination and a qualificationcurriculum, a person is considered fully qualified to perform assignedduties. a. <T3>Crewmember qualification</T3> fully prepares a person for a particularcrewmember position on a specific make, model, and series aircraft (orvariant). Initial supervised operating experience and, if appropriate,the practical evaluation associated with airmen certification are alsoparts of a qualification curriculum. b. <T3>Instructor qualification</T3> includes the training and the writtenoral, and practical evaluation necessary to qualify a pilot or flight engineerto conduct flight instruction on a particular make, model, and series aircraft(or variant). Instructor qualification also prepares persons for instructorduties other than flight instructor duties. After successfully completinginstructor indoctrination and qualification, a person is qualified forand may be assigned instructor duties in an AQP. c. <T3>Evaluator qualification</T3> includes the training and the written,oral, and practical evaluation necessary to qualify an instructor to evaluateon a particular make, model, and series aircraft (or variant). After successfullycompleting evaluator indoctrination and qualification, a person is qualifiedfor and may be assigned as an evaluator in an AQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">24. Continued qualification</ITAG>Continued qualification curriculums include recurrent ground and flighttraining, recurrent proficiency evaluations, online evaluations, and recencyof experience activities. Continued qualification curriculums are developedfor all instructors, evaluators, crewmembers and dispatchers. Continuedqualification is planned for and conducted in a recurring manner that ensureseach major subject and event required for original qualification is reviewedon a cycle that initially may not exceed 26 months. Critical elements andevents should be revisited several times during a cycle. Fully qualifiedpersons are automatically placed on a continued qualification cycle specificallydesigned for their duty position and aircraft assignment. A person whois qualified in more than one aircraft or in more than one duty positionmust participate in separate continuing qualification activities for eachassigned aircraft and/or duty position. Persons will not normally be authorizedto maintain qualification as either instructors or evaluators in more thantwo aircraft or duty positions.Section 2. Structure of an AQP<ITAG tagnum="81">25. Curriculums</ITAG>The basic unit of an AQP is the curriculum. An AQP consists of at leasta general indoctrination curriculum, qualification curriculums, and continuedqualification curriculums. A qualification or continued qualification curriculumspecifies the training and qualification requirements for a specific dutyposition (e.g., PIC, SIC) and make (e.g., Boeing, Lockheed, Cessna), model(e.g., B-747, L-1011, C-500), and series (e.g., -100, -200) of aircraft.More than one make, model, and series of aircraft (or variant) can be includedin one qualification or continued qualification curriculum only if theFAA determines that the aircraft are compatible for this purpose. In someinstances a qualification or continued qualification curriculum will haveto be specific to a variation of a make, model, series aircraft. This wouldbe required when aircraft in the same series have variations that requiredifferent knowledge, skills, and abilities to assure safe operation ofthe aircraft. For example, if within the same series, one aircraft hasa traditional analog instrument display while another has an electronicdigital display (glass cockpit), the qualification curriculum would haveto be tailored to each variation of that series of aircraft. For generalindoctrination the curriculum does not have to be aircraft specific. Theterm ``group,'' as used in Part 121, Subparts N and O in reference to aircraft,does not apply to activities approved under SFAR XX.<ITAG tagnum="81">26. Curriculum Segments</ITAG>Each curriculum consists of specific curriculum segments. A curriculumsegment is a group of broadly related training subjects and activities.Curriculum segments may be titled as follows:andbullet; General operational ground training.andbullet; Aircraft specific ground training.andbullet; Flight training.andbullet; Differences training.andbullet; Special curriculum segment.andbullet; Evaluations.andbullet; Airman certification practical evaluation.andbullet; Supervised operating experience.<ITAG tagnum="81">27. Training, evaluation and currency modules</ITAG>Each curriculum segment consists of modules. A module is an outline ofclosely related elements (ground activities) or events (flight activities)on which the operator must provide instruction or evaluation or provideopportunity to practice or perform currency activities.<ITAG tagnum="81">28. Developing modules</ITAG>The following paragraphs provide examples and guidelines for developingmodules. The examples are not intended to imply the only acceptable method,sequence of instructional delivery, subject titles, or amount of detail.a. <T3>Example of related elements in an aircraft ground training module:</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s50,r50</C> <H1>Electrical system</H1><H1>Title of module</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andbullet; Systems overview<D>Elements Within a Module.</D></ITAG>andbullet; AC Powerandbullet; Standby Powerandbullet; APU Generatorandbullet; External Powerandbullet; Power Distributionandbullet; Circuit Protectionandbullet; Controls and Indicatorsandbullet; Limitationsandbullet; Normal Proceduresandbullet; Abnormal and Emergency Procedures</ITAG>b. <T3>Example of related training events in a flight training module:</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s50,r50</C> <H1>First simulator period</H1><H1>Title of module</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">andbullet; Use of checklist<D>Events Within a Module.</D></ITAG>andbullet; Engine starts and powerplant checkandbullet; Taxiandbullet; Normal takeoffsandbullet; Area departureandbullet; Holding patternsandbullet; Descent and area arrivalsandbullet; ILS approaches (all engines and an engine out)andbullet; Normal landings</ITAG>c. <T3>Each module should contain sufficient detail</T3> to ensure that themain features of the principal subject will be addressed. The scope andcontent of the modules, when incorporated into a curriculum segment, shouldensure that a person satisfactorily completing the curriculum can satisfactorilyperform in an assigned duty position.d. <T3>Modules may be developed in a manner which considers previous experienceand training.</T3> Previous experience considerations include a person'spast experience in Part 121 or 135 operations, previously held duty positions,previous experience with a specific aircraft, and past experience withthe operator's systems, methods and procedures.e. <T3>Modules should highlight certain topics which need emphasis.</T3> Forexample, modules developed for PICs previously qualified as SICs in thesame aircraft should emphasize duty position responsibilities. SIC qualificationof flight engineers previously qualified on the same aircraft, however,should emphasize piloting skills as well as the requirements of the newduty position. Modules that qualify a person in the same duty positionon another aircraft should emphasize aircraft systems as well as the proceduresand crewmember skills needed to operate the different aircraft.f. <T3>Modules may be developed so that they can be used in several curriculums.</T3>For example, the module outlining elements of training to be given on aparticular powerplant may be used in curriculums for several differentaircraft which use the same powerplant. The same module on review of emergencyevacuation procedures could be used in both qualification and continuedqualification curriculums.<ITAG tagnum="81">29. Special Curriculum Segments</ITAG>Certificate holders may have a need for special skills which require specificqualification and specific continued qualification activities and whichdo not apply to an entire group of personnel. For example, an operatorthat uses Boeing 757/767 aircraft in both domestic and intercontinentaloperations may qualify a small number of its crews for long range, overwater operations. In this situation, the operator may develop special curriculumsegments to meet the requirements for instruction, evaluation and currencywhich apply to this small group.<ITAG tagnum="81">30. Temporary special curriculum segment</ITAG>In those cases where a certificate holder has special, temporary qualificationrequirements, a temporary special curriculum segment may be developed.For example, if a certificate holder equips its entire fleet with LORANC navigation equipment, it would amend its existing qualification and continuedqualification curriculum and might add a temporary special curriculum segmentto initially qualify all its presently qualified flight crewmembers inthe use of this equipment. After all presently qualified crewmembers werequalified in LORAN C operations, the certificate holder would notify theFAA that the special curriculum segment was no longer needed, and the FAAwould withdraw approval for it.<ITAG tagnum="81">31. Illustration of AQP Structure</ITAG>Figure 2-1 illustrates the structural units involved in AQPs. The illustrationconsists of five parts.<ITAG tagnum="81">32.-39. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration 2611</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-C</ITAG>Section 3. Additional Components of an AQP<ITAG tagnum="81">40. Cockpit Resource Management (CRM) and Line Oriented Flight Training(LOFT)</ITAG>SFAR XX requires that each AQP qualification and continued qualificationcurriculum include CRM training and evaluation appropriate to each dutyposition and be conducted in simulated operational scenarios. (For guidelinessee A/C 120.XXX, ``Effective Cockpit Resource Management Training,'' andA/C 120-35A, ``Line Oriented Flight Training.'')<ITAG tagnum="81">41. Facilities</ITAG>Each AQP submission should contain a description of the facilities thatthe certificate holder intends to use. These facilities may belong to thecertificate holder or may be operated by training centers. In either case,the submission should include a description of the facilities includingthe classrooms, types of training aids available, training materials tobe used, and other features of the facility that will make it conduciveto a positive learning environment.<ITAG tagnum="81">42. Training Equipment</ITAG>The submission should contain a list and description of the training equipmentto be used, the procedures for its use, and the organization responsiblefor its security and maintenance.<ITAG tagnum="81">43. Identification of Flight Training Equipment</ITAG>A flight simulator or flight training device to be used in an AQP curriculumshould be identified by make, model, serial number, and manufacturer; orby the FAA identification number assigned by the Manager of the NationalSimulator Program Team. If equipment is to be updated or replaced to accommodatethe needs of the proposed AQP, this information should be included, andthe new or updated equipment identified as specified above. Identificationis particularly important whenever a certificate holder intends to contractfor use of a flight simulator or flight training device which does notexactly replicate the certificate holder's aircraft configurations. Thedescription should provide sufficiently detailed information to enablethe FAA to determine what training and evaluation can be conducted in eachproposed device configuration. (For more information on flight simulatorand flight training devices, see Chapter 11 of this A/C.)<ITAG tagnum="81">44. Courseware</ITAG>The certificate holder should describe the kinds of courseware to be usedin an AQP. Examples of courseware include: lesson plans, event descriptionpackages, audiovisual programs, and workbooks.<ITAG tagnum="81">45. Experience level of instructions and evaluators</ITAG>A list of qualifications for ground and flight instructors and evaluatorsshould be included with submission for approval of an AQP. Normally, eachinstructor and evaluator should have previous experience working for thecertificate holder or the training center the certificate holder intendsto hire. Each person assigned as an instructor or evaluator must be fullyqualified. (For more information on training and testing of instructorsand evaluators, see Chapter 8.)<ITAG tagnum="81">46. Aircraft fleet and fleet mix</ITAG>The certificate holder should provide a description of its aircraft fleet,including the quantity of each make, model, and series of aircraft (orvariant). This information is important in assessing what common trainingmust occur throughout the fleet and determining whether that training isaddressed in the proposed AQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">47. Operating environment</ITAG>The certificate holder should include a description of its operating environment,including what types of operations it conducts, for example long range,regional, over water, etc. The AQP should provide qualification standardsconsistent with the type of operation the certificate holder conducts.<ITAG tagnum="81">48. Certificate holder's history</ITAG>a. <T3>Previous training experience.</T3> The certificate holder should describeits previous training experience.b. <T3>Incidents and pilot deviations.</T3> Each certificate holder shouldinclude an account of its recent history of incidents and pilot deviationsand describe the way the AQP will provide means to correct any patternsof deficiencies which are determined to be a component of the incidentor deviation history.c. <T3>Compliance history.</T3> The certificate holder should include an accountof its compliance history with Parts 121 or 135 training rules. Of particularinterest are those areas where the certificate holder has held exemptionsfrom the Parts 121 or 135 requirements. The certificate holder should identifythose qualification issues it believes need particular focus in training.The FAA will review the certificate holder's demonstrated ability to meettraining commitments.d. <T3>Characteristics of the work force subject to the AQP. </T3>Characteristicsof the work force such as anticipated degree of growth, rate of turnover,acquisition of other companies, rapid expansion, mergers, and number ofpromotions should be assessed and described. These factors may affect thevalidity of the proposed continued qualification schedules.<ITAG tagnum="81">49. Proposed Continued Qualification Schedule. </ITAG>Each certificate holder must provide proposed calendar schedules for continuedqualification activities. (Guidelines for developing such a schedule appearin Chapter 5 of this A/C.)<ITAG tagnum="81">50. Certificate Holder's Program Evaluation Plan.</ITAG>Each certificate holder should describe how it intends to monitor the performanceof its AQP. This description should include methods for observing trainingand evaluation, for evaluating instructors and evaluators, and for analyzingtraining and evaluation results to determine if AQP objectives are beingmet. (See Chapter 6, section 2, for further information on program evaluation.)<ITAG tagnum="81">51. Data Collection. </ITAG>The certificate holder should also include with each qualification andcontinued qualification curriculum data collection procedures. These proceduresshould include a description of quantitative data to be collected, analyzed,and provided to the FAA, showing trends in crewmember and/or dispatcherperformance.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Summaries of collected data are required to be submittedto the FAA so that qualitative analyses and comparisons of different AQPsmay be made. The certificate holder, however, may also use this data forits self-evaluation purposes. See Chapter 6, section 2, for guidelineson data collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">52. International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) Standards</ITAG>The FAA will review each AQP to ensure that any standards for airman certificationwhich are provided in any AQP conform with applicable ICAO standards.<ITAG tagnum="81">53.-59. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 3. General Indoctrination Curriculum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">60. Purpose</ITAG>This chapter provides guidance in developing curriculum segments and modulesthat constitute a general indoctrination curriculum.<ITAG tagnum="81">61. General.</ITAG>General indoctrination is required for all newly hired crewmembers, dispatchersand instructors. It is normally the first curriculum conducted. The objectiveof general indoctrination is to introduce the employee to the certificateholder's manner of conducting operations. Two distinct training areas ofindoctrination are certificate holder-specific training and duty position-specifictraining. These two areas serve to acquaint students with the certificateholder's means of regulatory compliance and to ensure crewmember and dispatcherstudents acquire acceptable levels of basic aeronautical knowledge beforebeginning aircraft specific training. Emergency situation training, whichis part of general indoctrination, has some segments that are certificateholder-specific and some that are duty position-specific. For an exampleof a general indoctrination curriculum, see Figure 3-1.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-C</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">62. Certificate Holder Specific Indoctrination</ITAG>The subject area of an indoctrination curriculum referred to as ``certificateholder-specific'' includes elements that pertain to the certificate holder'smethods of compliance with regulations and safe operating practices. Thefollowing are examples of recommended elements of certificate holder-specificsubject areas for flight crewmembers:(1) Duties and responsibilities:andbullet; Company history, organization, and management structure.andbullet; Operational concepts, policies, and kinds of operation.andbullet; Company forms, records, and administrative procedures.andbullet; Employee standards and rules of conduct.andbullet; Employee compensation, benefits and contracts andbullet; Authority and responsibilities of duty positionandbullet; Personal equipmentandbullet; Company manual organization, revisions, and employee responsibilitiesconcerning manuals.(2) Appropriate provisions of the Federal Aviation Regulations and otherapplicable regulations:andbullet; Flight crewmember certification, training, and qualification requirementsandbullet; Medical certificates, physical examinations, and fitness for dutyrequirements.andbullet; Flight control requirements (dispatch, flight release or flightlocating).andbullet; Flight time, duty and rest requirements.andbullet; Recordkeeping requirements.andbullet; Company manuals.andbullet; Flightcrew emergency authority, what to do in the event of interferencewith crewmembers, how to report these occurrences.(3) Content of Operating Certificate and Operations Specifications:andbullet; Regulatory basis in Parts 121 or 135 (as applicable) and the FAAct of 1958 (as amended).andbullet; Definitions, description, and organization of operations specifications.andbullet; Limitations and authorizations of operations specifications.andbullet; Description of certificate.andbullet; Description of FAA certificate holding district office and responsibilitiesof FAA principal inspectors.(4) Emergency situations:(a) Flight crewmember duties and responsibilities:andbullet; Emergency assignments.andbullet; Pilot in Command's emergency authority.andbullet; Reporting incidents and accidents.(b) Crew coordination and company communication:andbullet; Cabin crew notification procedures.andbullet; Ground agencies (FAA, Airport Authority) notification procedures.andbullet; Company communication procedures.(c) Ground Evacuation:andbullet; Aircraft configuration.andbullet; Directing passenger flow.andbullet; Blocked or jammed exit procedures.andbullet; Fuel spills and other ground hazards.andbullet; Handicapped persons.(d) Ditching:andbullet; Cockpit and cabin preparation.andbullet; Passenger briefing.andbullet; Crew coordination.andbullet; Primary swells, secondary swells, and sea conditions.andbullet; Ditching heading considering wind and water conditions.andbullet; Ditching at night.(e) Previous aircraft accidents/incidents:andbullet; NTSB accident report reviews.andbullet; Human factors/considerations.andbullet; NASA reporting system.<ITAG tagnum="81">63. Duty Position-Specific Indoctrination.</ITAG>The duty position-specific modules of an indoctrination curriculum segmentprovide a basis for students to enter subsequent qualification curriculums.These modules address appropriate portions of a certificate holder's manualand the standard practices of airmanship and flight procedures referencedin other documents such as the Airman's Information Manual. Emphasis induty position-specific training is not <T3>aircraft</T3> specific. Instead, it should relate to the kinds of operationand general characteristics of the certificate holder's fleet of aircraft.The objective of duty position-specific training is to ensure each studenthas acquired the basic knowledge and abilities necessary for Parts 121and/or 135 operations. The scope of duty position-specific training variesaccording to the anticipated duty position evaluators (EV), instructors(IN), pilots-in-command (PIC), seconds-in-command (SIC), flight engineers(FE), aircraft dispatchers (AD), and flight attendants (FA). The followingare examples of recommended elements for the ``duty position-specific''subject areas for flight crewmembers:(1) Company Flight Control:andbullet; Dispatch, flight release, or flight locating systems and procedures(as applicable).andbullet; Organization, duties, and responsibilities.andbullet; Weather and Notice to Airman information.andbullet; Company communications.(2) Principles of Weight and Balance:andbullet; Definitions (such as zero fuel weight, moment, etc.).andbullet; General loading procedures and center of gravity computations.andbullet; Effects of fuel burn and load shifts in flight.andbullet; Weight and balance forms, load manifests, fuel slips and otherapplicable documents.(3) Principles of Aircraft Performance and Airport Analysis:andbullet; Definitions (such as balanced field, VMC, obstruction planes,maximum endurance, etc.).andbullet; Effects of temperature and pressure altitude.andbullet; TERPS criteria (obstacle clearance standards).andbullet; Airport analysis system (as appropriate to the kinds of operationand aircraft used).andbullet; Effects of contaminated runways.(4) Principles of Meteorology:andbullet; Basic weather definitions (such as forecasts, reports, and symbols).andbullet; Temperature, pressure, and winds.andbullet; Atmosphere moisture and clouds.andbullet; Air masses and fronts.andbullet; Thunderstorms, icing and windshear.(5) Principles of Navigation:andbullet; Definitions (such as class I, class II navigation).andbullet; Basic navigational instruments and equipment.andbullet; Concepts and procedures pertaining to dead reckoning and pilotage.andbullet; Navigational aids.andbullet; VHF, VLF, LORAN and self contained systems (as applicable).(6) Airspace and ATC Procedures:andbullet; Definitions (such as precision approaches, airways, and ATIS).andbullet; Description of airspace.andbullet; Navigation performance and separation standards.andbullet; Controller and pilot responsibilities.andbullet; ATC communications.andbullet; Air traffic flow control.(7) Enroute and Terminal Area Charting and Flight Planning:andbullet; Terminology of charting services such as Jeppesen or NOAA.andbullet; Takeoff minimums, landing minimums, and alternate requirements.andbullet; Company flight planning procedures.andbullet; Flight service and international procedures (as applicable).andbullet; Airport diagrams.(8) Concepts of Instrument Procedures:andbullet; Definitions (such as MDA, HAA, HAT, DH, CAT II, ILS, and NOPT).andbullet; Non-precision approaches.andbullet; Circling, visual, and contact approaches (as applicable).(9) Emergency Situations:(a) Aircraft Fires.andbullet; Principles of combustion and classes of fire.andbullet; Toxic fumes and chemical irritants.andbullet; Use of appropriate hand held extinguisher.andbullet; Lavatory fires.andbullet; Smoke masks and goggles.(b) First Aid Equipment:andbullet; Contents of first aid kit.andbullet; Kit integrity requirements.andbullet; Use of individual items.(c) Illness, injury, and basic first aid:andbullet; Principles of CPR.andbullet; Ear and sinus blocks.andbullet; Seeking medical assistance.andbullet; Treatment of shock.andbullet; Heart attack.andbullet; Emergencies during pregnancy.(d) Rapid Decompression:andbullet; Respiration.andbullet; Hypoxia, hypothermia, hyperventilation.andbullet; Time of useful consciousness.andbullet; Gas expansion/bubble formation.andbullet; Physical phenomena and actual incidents.(e) Crewmember incapacitation:andbullet; Company procedures.andbullet; Reporting requirements (NTSB).andbullet; Interference with crewmembers resulting in incapacitation.(f) Uninhabited Environment Situations:andbullet; Basic Survival.andbullet; Decision to remain within aircraft.andbullet; Position reporting and communications.andbullet; Emergency ground to air signals.andbullet; Shelter, food, and water.<ITAG tagnum="81">64.-69. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 4. Qualification Curriculums</ITAG>Section 1. Introduction<ITAG tagnum="81">70. Purpose</ITAG>This chapter provides guidance in developing curriculum segments and modulesthat constitute qualification curriculums, and it is divided between groundactivities and flight activities. The guidance is based on requirementsspecified in Parts 121 and 135. A certificate holder may choose to followthe standard requirements expressed in those regulations or may add toor revise those requirements in its AQP curriculums. Differences betweenstandard requirements and those specified in a certificate holder's AQPcurriculum should be identified. The revisions proposed by the certificateholders should be shown to provide more effective and appropriate meansof training and evaluation.<ITAG tagnum="81">71. Planned Hours</ITAG>Qualification curriculums must include planned hours for ground instruction,flight instruction, evaluation, and supervised operating experience. Plannedhours are intended to provide more flexibility than did the programmedhours which were required for standard training programs. For example,if an individual appears ready for proficiency evaluation in less thanthe planned hours, he may be evaluated. If he passes, he may move on tothe next step. If he does not pass, he must complete the planned hoursand be evaluated again.<ITAG tagnum="81">72. Differences Training</ITAG>A certificate holder must specify whether differences training is includedin ground and flight curriculum segments for each make, model, and seriesaircraft (or variant) or is established in a separate curriculum segment.<ITAG tagnum="81">73. Sample Qualification Curriculum</ITAG>Figure 4-1 provides an example of a qualification curriculum.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration 2 631</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-C</ITAG>Section 2. Pilot and Flight Engineers Ground Qualification Activities<ITAG tagnum="81">74. General</ITAG>To be qualified for a particular duty position in a specific make, model,and series aircraft (or variant), a person will receive aircraft specificground training. This training includes general operational subjects, aircraftsystems, aircraft system integration, and emergency drill training.<ITAG tagnum="81">75. General Operational Subjects</ITAG>The subject area of qualification referred to as ``general operationalsubjects'' includes instruction on certain operational requirements thatare specific to the aircraft in which the qualification is being conducted.The general operational subject area of a curriculum should include atleast the following:(1) Dispatch, flight release, or flight locating procedures.(2) Weight and balance procedures to include computation of company weightand balance forms.(3) Adverse weather practices including procedures which must be followedwhen operating in the following conditions:andbullet; Icing.andbullet; Turbulence.andbullet; Heavy precipitation.andbullet; Thunderstorms with associated windshear and microburst phenomena:andbullet; Low visibility.andbullet; Contaminated runways.(4) Procedures for operating communications and navigation equipment inaccordance with the following:andbullet; Specific company communications requirements.andbullet; ATC clearance requirements.andbullet; Area departure and arrival requirements.andbullet; Enroute requirements.andbullet; Approach and landing requirements.(5) Specific performance characteristics of the aircraft during all flightregimes including:andbullet; The use of charts, tables, tabulated data and other related manualinformation.andbullet; Normal, abnormal and emergency performance problems.andbullet; Meteorological and weight limited performance factors (temperature,pressure, contaminated runways, precipitation, climb/runway limits).andbullet; Inoperative equipment performance limiting factors (for example,inoperative anti-skid, if allowed by MEL).andbullet; Special operational conditions such as unpaved runways, high altitudeairports and drift down requirements.<ITAG tagnum="81">76. Aircraft Systems</ITAG>The second subject area of an aircraft qualification curriculum is the``aircraft systems'' area. This area may be particularly adaptive to theuse of modules due to the modular nature of each system and its relatedcomponents. Instruction and evaluation on each aircraft system must bein sufficient detail to ensure the student clearly understands system components,limitations, relevant controls, actuators, annunciators and proceduresfor the various system configurations he will use. It is not possible tolist every conceivable aircraft system that should be included in an aircraftground curriculum segment; however, the following illustrates the depthand scope that should be provided:<T3>(1) Aircraft general. </T3>Typical elements include an overview ofthe basic aircraft such as dimensions, turning radius, panel layouts, cockpitand cabin configurations, and other major systems and components or appliances.<T3>(2) Powerplants. </T3>Typical elements include a basic descriptionof the engine, its thrust rating, engine components such as accessory drives,ignition, oil, fuel control, hydraulic, and bleed air features.<T3>(3) Electrical. </T3>Typical elements should include the sources ofaircraft power including engine driven generators, APU generator, and externalpower. Other elements include electrical buses and related components suchas circuit breakers, fuses, aircraft batteries and other, applicable standbypower systems.<T3>(4) Hydraulic. </T3>Typical elements are hydraulic reservoirs, pumps,accumulators; the means of routing hydraulic fliuid through filters, checkvalves, and interconnects to associated actuators and other hydraulicallyoperated components.<T3>(5) Fuel. </T3>Elements include the fuel tank system (location andquantities), engine driven pumps, boost pumps, systems valves, crossfeeds,quantity indicators and provisions (if applicable) for fuel jettisoning.<T3>(6) Pneumatic. </T3>Typical elements include bleed air sources suchas engine, APU, or external ground air; the means of routing, venting andcontrolling bleed air via associated valves, ducts, chambers; and the purposeand operation of temperature and pressure limiting devices.<T3>(7) Air conditioning and pressurization. </T3>Typical elements includeheaters, air conditioning packs, fans, and other environmental controldevices. Pressurization system components include elements such as outflowand relief valves with associated automatic, standby, and manual pressurizationcontrols and annunciators.<T3>(8) Flight controls. </T3>Elements include primary controls (yaw, pitch,and roll devices) and secondary controls (leading/trailing edge devices,flaps, trim, and damping mechanisms). Automatic stability and control systemsshould be included. Redundant systems capabilities should also be included.<T3>(9) Landing gear.</T3> Typical elements are the landing gear extensionand retraction mechanism (including the operating sequence of struts, doors,and locking devices), brake and, if applicable, antiskid systems. Othertypical elements include steering (nose or body steering gear), bogie arrangements,air/ground sensor relays, and visual downlock indicators.<T3>(10) Ice and rain protection.</T3> Typical elements include each anti-icingand deicing system which prevents or removes airfoil, flight control, engine,pilot-static probe, fluid outlet, cockpit window, and aircraft structureice. Other typical elements include system components such as pneumatic/electricalvalves, sensors, ducts, electrical elements, pneumatic devices, and pumps.<T3>(11) Equipment and furnishings.</T3> Typical elements are aircraftexists, galleys, water and waste systems, lavatories, cargo areas, crewmemberand passenger seats, bulkheads, seating or cargo configuration, and non-emergencyequipment and furnishings.<T3>(12) Navigation equipment.</T3> Typical elements are flight navigationsystem components including flight directors, horizontal situation indicators,radio magnetic indicators, navigation receivers (ADF, VOR, OMEGA, LORAN-C,RNAV, Marker Beacon, DME, etc.). Other typical elements include inertialsystem (INS, IRS) functional displays, fault indicators, comparator systems,transponders, radio altimeters, weather radars, and cathode ray tube (orother computer generated) displays of aircraft position and navigationinformation.<T3>(13) Auto flight system.</T3> Typical elements include such items ofequipment as autopilots, autothrottles and their interface with aircraftflight director and navigation systems including automatic approach tracking,autoload, and automatic fuel or performance management systems.<T3>(14) Flight instruments.</T3> Typical elements should include an overviewof the panel arrangement and the electrical, pneumatic, and primary andalternate pitot-static sources for flight instruments. Other elements includeattitude, heading (directional gyro and magnetic), airspeed and verticalspeed indicators, altimeters, standby flight instruments, and other relevantinstruments.<T3>(15) Communication equipment.</T3> Typical elements include VHF/HFradios, audio panels, service and inflight interphone system, passengeraddress systems, voice recorders, and air/ground data communciations systems(ACARS).<T3>(16) Warning systems.</T3> Typical elements are aircraft aural, visual,and tactile warning systems including recognition of the character anddegree of urgency related to each signal. Other typical elements includewarning and caution annunciator systems including ground proximity andtakeoff warning systems.<T3>(17) Fire protection.</T3> Typical elements include fire and overheatsensors, loops, modules, or other means of providing visual and/or auralindications of fire or overheat detection. Other typical elements includeprocedures for use of fire wall shutoff controls, manual and automaticextinguishing systems, and power sources necessary to provide protectionfor fire and overheat conditions in engines, APUs, cargo bays, wheel wells,the cockpit, the cabin, and in lavatories.<T3>(18) Oxygen.</T3> Typical elements are the aircraft oxygen system includingthe fixed passenger, crew systems, and installed portable systems. Othertypical elements include sources of oxygen (gaseous or solid), flow anddistribution networks, automatic deployment systems, regulators, pressurelevels, gauges, and servicing requirements.<T3>(19) Lighting.</T3> Typical elements are the cockpit, cabin, and externallighting systems including power sources, switch positions, and spare lightbulblocations.<T3>(20) Emergency equipment.</T3> Typical elements describe the type,location, use, and purpose of each installed item of emergency equipmentsuch as fire and oxygen bottles, first aid kits, life rafts, life preservers,crash axes, emergency exits and lights. Other typical elements includeeach item of egress equipment such as slides, slide rafts, escape strapsor handles, hatches, ropes, ladders or moveable stairs.<T3>(21) Auxiliary Power Unit (APU).</T3> Typical elements include theinstallation of the APU, its capacity and operation, including its electricaland bleed air capabilities, and how it interfaces with other aircraft systems.These elements include APU components such as inlet doors, exhaust ducts,and fuel supply.<ITAG tagnum="81">77. Aircraft System Integration</ITAG>The third subject area of a qualification curriculum is referred to as``System Integration.'' This area provides students with instruction andevaluation on how aircraft systems interrelate with respect to normal,abnormal, and emergency procedures. This training ranges from proceduresas basic as how to apply power to the aircraft electrical and pneumaticsystems with the APU to complex tasks such as how to program computerizednavigation and autoflight systems. System integration should include developingflightcrew interaction in the use of checklists and other operational procedures.It is normally conducted by using training devices which portray a specificcockpit layout including switch and indicator logic. The flight trainingdevices and flight simulators described in Advisory Circular 120-45 andAdvisory Circular 120-48A as amended may be used for system integration.Additionally, computer based instruction or other interactive media maybe used. Aircraft system integration may be conducted in concert with aircraftsystems training or as an independently conducted part of a qualificationcurriculum. Effective systems integration serves as a logical connectionbetween ground instructional delivery methods and flight training. It allowsstudents to become familiar with a particular cockpit layout, checklist,operator procedures, and other areas which are best learned before conductingactual flight events. The following are examples of typical aircraft systemintegration elements:<T3>(1) Use of checklist.</T3> Typical elements include safety checks,cockpit preparation (switch position and checklist flows), checklist calloutsand responses, and checklist sequence.<T3>(2) Flight planning.</T3> Elements typically include performance limitations(meteorological, weight, and MEL/CDL items), required fuel loads, weatherplanning (lower than standard takeoff minimums or alternate airport requirements).<T3>(3) Display systems.</T3> Typical elements include use of weather radarand other CRT displays (checklist, vertical navigation or positional navigationdisplays).<T3>(4) Navigation systems.</T3> Elements typically include preflight andinflight operation of receivers, on-board navigation systems, and flightplan information input and retrieval.<T3>(5) Autoflight.</T3> Typical elements include autopilots, autothrust,and flight director systems including appropriate procedures, normal andabnormal indications, and annunciators.<T3>(6) Cockpit familiarization.</T3> Typical elements involve activationof aircraft system controls and switches to include normal, abnormal, andemergency switch and control positions and relevant annunciators, lightsand/or other caution and warning systems.Aircraft system integration may be as simplistic as a student learningchecklist procedures in a single engine aircraft or as complex as programmingaircraft computer systems for an international flight. System integrationis particularly effective where aircraft are equipped with relatively sophisticatedcomputerized navigation, flight director, performance, and/or autoflightsystems. The key to effectiveness in this area is to use training deviceswhich provide accurate, real time, and interactive media for student practice.The functional requirements of these training devices do not necessarilyinclude motion, visual systems or aircraft specific flight handling characteristics.However, each training device should accurately portray relevant keyboards,switches, other controls, CRT's, and other displays and will always includeair/ground and flight path logic.<ITAG tagnum="81">78. Emergency Drill Training</ITAG>The fourth subject area of a qualification curriculum is Emergency DrillTraining. This training should include at least the following events:(1) Operation of each type of emergency exit in the normal and emergencymodes.(2) Operation of each type of hand held fire extinguisher.(3) Operation of each type of emergency oxygen system.(4) Donning, use, and inflation of life preservers and the use of otherflotation devices (if applicable).(5) Ditching procedures (if applicable) including cockpit preparation,crew coordination, passenger briefing and cabin preparation, the use oflifelines, and boarding of passengers and crew into a life-raft or slideraft.(6) Donning and use of protective breathing equipment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section 3. Pilot and Flight Engineers Flight Qualification Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">79. General Guidelines</ITAG>Each AQP must include curriculum segments for flight training, flight evaluationand supervised operating experience for appropriate personnel. Each AQPmust also include a curriculum segment or evaluation modules which describein detail the practical tests for airman certification which will be usedfor persons who will acquire airman certificates, or additional category,class, instrument or type ratings through an AQP. The following guidelinesare provided to assist operators in development of curriculum segmentsfor flight training, flight evaluation, and airman certification, and supervisedoperating experience.a. <T3>Flight instruction/evaluation tables. </T3>The applicant should usethe flight instruction/evaluation tables in this Advisory Circular to begindevelopment of a list of applicable events for each training, evaluation,and certification curriculum segment or module.b. <T3>Other guidelines. </T3>The applicant should continue development ofthe lists for each curriculum segment by using the Aircraft Flight Manual,the Aircraft Operating Manual, and Flight Standardization Board reportsfor the particular aircraft. The applicant may propose additional or modifiedevents based on unique requirements, operational experiences, advancedtechnology or other factors. If modifications are proposed, the applicantshould show how the proposed events will provide at least an equivalentlevel of qualification.c. <T3>Methods and standards. </T3>The applicant should identify the methodsand standards for proper execution of each event.d. <T3>LOFT. </T3>The applicant should develop LOFT scenarios for each applicablecurriculum segment using the appropriate guidelines for LOFT in AdvisoryCircular 120.35A, as amended.e. <T3>CRM. </T3>The applicant should integrate throughout each curriculumsegment the principals of cockpit resource management (CRM) described inAdvisory Circular XXXX, as amended.f. <T3>Airman certification. </T3>In curriculum segments which include evaluationmodules developed to provide alternative practical tests for airman certification,the applicant must show to the satisfaction of the FAA that the test proposedby the applicant will ensure a level of individual airman competency thatexceeds the minimum standards prescribed by Parts 61, 63, and 65 and ensuresthat each person certificated by means of an AQP has demonstrated satisfactoryinteractive CRM skills.g. <T3>Supervised operating experience. </T3>Supervised operating experiencecurriculum segments are integral to any qualification curriculum. An applicantmay develop supervised operating experience curriculum segments which includea required participation level expressed in either flight hours or specifiednumber of iterations (or combination thereof) of the events and activitiesspecified in the curriculum segment. Supervised operating experience willbe supervised by an appropriately and currently qualified evaluator. Theperson gaining the experience will perform the duties of his newly assignedposition at the appropriate pilot, engineer, instructor, or evaluator controlstation. For pilots and flight engineers, supervised operating experiencemay only be obtained during actual flight operations in proving tests orduring actual flight operation in air transportation or air commerce. Supervisedoperating experience is an alternate means of compliance with the provisionsfor Initial Operating Experience requirements of Parts 121 and 135.<ITAG tagnum="81">80. Approved Use of Flight Training Equipment</ITAG>Flight training equipment consists of seven levels of flight training devices,four levels of flight simulators, and aircraft. The approved use of eachitem of flight training equipment is listed in the maneuvers and procedurestables. These devices and simulators are the only types of flight trainingequipment (other than aircraft) which may be approved for use in an FAA-approvedflight training program. Before any flight training device or flight simulatorcan be used it must be evaluated and qualified by the National SimulatorProgram Manager (NSPM) and approved by the FAA for use in the operator'sAQP. The following paragraphs describe the flight training devices andflight simulators applicable to Parts 121 and 135 flight training. Advisorycirculars 120-40 and 120-45 as amended provide the qualification policy,criteria, and more detailed technical descriptions of flight simulatorsand flight training devices. The functional descriptions in the followingparagraphs provide only a brief overview. Therefore, the appropriate advisorycirculars are the only authorized source documents and must be used forevaluation and approval of flight training devices and flight simulators.<ITAG tagnum="21">[<T4>Note._</T4>FYI: The Functional and Technical Descriptions for the FirstThree Levels of Flight Training Devices Are Under Development and at ThisTime Have no Applicability to Part 121 or 135 Flight Training.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">81. Level 4_Flight Training Device</ITAG>A. <T3>Purpose. </T3>To permit learning, development, and practice of skillsand cockpit procedures necessary to understand and operate the integratedsystems of a specified aircraft.B. <T3>Functional description. </T3>A level 4 training device has the followingcharacteristics and components:andbullet; A replica of the flight deck panels, switches, controls, and instrumentsin proper relationship to represent the aircraft for which training isto be accomplished.andbullet; Systems indications which respond appropriately to switches andcontrols which are required to be installed for the training or checkingto be accomplished.andbullet; Air/ground logic but simulated aerodynamic capabilities are notrequired.<ITAG tagnum="81">82. Level 5_Flight Training Device</ITAG>A. <T3>Purpose. </T3>To permit learning, development, and practice of skills,cockpit procedures, and instrument flight procedures necessary to understandand operate the integrated systems of a specific aircraft in typical flightoperations in real time.B. <T3>Functional description. </T3>A level 5 training device has the followingcharacteristics and components:andbullet; A replica of the flight deck panels, switches, controls, and instrumentsin proper relationship to represent the aircraft for which training isto be accomplished.andbullet; Systems indications which respond appropriately to switches andcontrols which are required to be installed for the training or checkingto be accomplished.andbullet; Simulated aerodynamic capabilities representative of the make,model, and series of the aircraft (or variant).andbullet; Functional flight and navigational controls, displays, and instrumentation.andbullet; Control forces and control travel of sufficient precision to manuallyfly an instrument approach.<ITAG tagnum="81">83. Level 6_Flight Training Device</ITAG>A. <T3>Purpose. </T3>(1) To permit learning, development, and practice ofskills in cockpit procedures, instrument flight procedures, certain symmetricalmaneuvers and flight characteristics necessary to operate the integratedsystems of a specific aircraft in typical flight operations.(2) To permit the use of previously approved nonvisual simulators and thecontinued use of advanced training devices (ATD) for those Part 135 operatorsapproved to use them.B. <T3>Functional description. </T3>A level 6 training device has the followingcharacteristics and components:andbullet; Systems indications which respond appropriately to switches andcontrols which are required to be installed.andbullet; Replication of the cockpit of the aircraft for which trainingis to be accomplished.andbullet; Simulated aerodynamic capabilities which closely represent thespecific aircraft in ground and flight operations.andbullet; Functional flight and navigational controls, displays, and instrumentation.andbullet; Control forces and control travel which correspond to the aircraft.andbullet; Instructor controls.<ITAG tagnum="21">[<T4>Note._</T4>FYI: Nonvisual Simulators Are Categorized With Level 6 TrainingDevices.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">84. Level 7_Flight Training Device</ITAG>A. <T3>Purpose. </T3>To permit learning, development, and practice of skillsin cockpit procedures, instrument flight procedures and maneuvers, andflight characteristics necessary to operate the integrated systems of aspecific aircraft in typical flight operations.B. <T3>Functional description. </T3>A level 7 training device has the followingcharacteristics and components:andbullet; Systems representations, switches, and controls which are requiredby the type design of the aircraft and by the approved training program.andbullet; Systems which respond appropriately and accurately to the switchesand controls of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Full-scale replication of the cockpit of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the aerodynamic and ground dynamic characteristicsof the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the effects of selected environmental conditionswhich the simulated aircraft might encounter.andbullet; Control forces, dynamics, and travel which correspond to the aircraft.andbullet; Instructor controls and seat.<ITAG tagnum="81">85. Level A Flight Simulator</ITAG>A. <T3>Purpose. </T3>To permit development and practice of the necessary skillsfor accomplishment of flight operational tasks to a prescribed standardof airman competency in a specific aircraft and duty position. Level Aflight simulators may be used for specified pilot recency of experiencerequirements and specified flight operational task training requirements.<ITAG tagnum="21">[<T4>Note._</T4>FYI: Level A Flight Simulators Comply With the TechnicalStandards Specified for Basic (Visual) Simulators in AC 120-40, as Amended.]</ITAG>B. <T3>Functional description. </T3>Level A flight simulators have the followingcharacteristics and components:andbullet; Systems representations, switches, and controls which are requiredby the type design of the aircraft and by the user's approved trainingprogram.andbullet; Systems which respond appropriately and accurately to the switchesand controls of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Full-scale replication of the cockpit of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the aerodynamic characteristics of the aircraftbeing simulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the effects of selected environmental conditionswhich the simulated aircraft might encounter.andbullet; Control forces and travel which correspond to the aircraft.andbullet; Instructor controls and seat.andbullet; At least a night visual system with at least a 45anddegrees; horizontalby 30anddegrees; vertical field of view for each pilot station.andbullet; A motion system with at least 3 degrees of freedom.<ITAG tagnum="81">86. Level B Flight Simulator</ITAG>A. <T3>Purpose. </T3>To permit development and practice of the necessary skillsfor accomplishment of flight operational tasks to a prescribed standardof airman competency in a specific aircraft and duty position. Level Bflight simulators may be used for pilot recency of experience requirementsand specified flight operational task training requirements.<ITAG tagnum="21">[<T4>Note._</T4>FYI: Level B Flight Simulators Comply With the TechnicalStandards Specified for Phase I Simulators in Part 121, Appendix H andAC 120-40, as Amended.]</ITAG>B. <T3>Functional requirements. </T3>Level B flight simulators have the followingcharacteristics and components:andbullet; Systems representations, switches, and controls which are requiredby the type design of the aircraft and by the users approved training program.andbullet; Systems which respond appropriately and accurately to the switchesand controls of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Full-scale replication of the cockpit of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the aerodynamic characteristics includingground effect, and ground dynamic characteristics of the aircraft beingsimulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the effects of selected environmental conditionswhich the simulated aircraft might encounter.andbullet; Control forces and travel which correspond to the aircraft.andbullet; Instructor controls and seat.andbullet; At least a night visual system with at least a 45anddegrees; horizontalby 30anddegrees; vertical field of view for each pilot station.andbullet; A motion system with at least 3 degrees of freedom.<ITAG tagnum="81">87. Level C Flight Simulator</ITAG>A. <T3>Purpose.</T3> To permit development and practice of the necessary skillsfor accomplishment of flight operational tasks to a prescribed standardof airman competency in a specific aircraft and duty position. Level Cflight simulators may be used for pilot recency of experience requirementsand specified flight operational task training.<ITAG tagnum="21">[<T4>Note._</T4>FYI: Level C Flight Simulators Comply With the TechnicalStandards Specified for ``Phase II Simulators'' in Part 121, Appendix Hand AC 120-40 (as Amended).]</ITAG>B. <T3>Functional description.</T3> Level C flight simulators have at leastthe following characteristics and components:andbullet; Systems representations, switches, and controls which are requiredby the type design of the aircraft and by the users approved training program.andbullet; Systems which respond appropriately and accurately to the switchesand controls of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Full-scale replication of the cockpit of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the aerodynamic characteristics includingground effect, and ground dynamic characteristics of the aircraft beingsimulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the effects of selected environmental conditionswhich the simulated aircraft might encounter.andbullet; Control forces, dynamics, and travel which correspond to the aircraft.andbullet; Instructor controls and seat.andbullet; At least a night and dusk visual system with at least a 75anddegrees;horizontal by 30anddegrees; vertical field of view for each pilot station.andbullet; A motion system with at least 6 degrees of freedom.<ITAG tagnum="81">88. Level D Flight Simulator.</ITAG>A.<T3> Purpose.</T3> To permit development and practice of the necessaryskills for the accomplishment of flight operational tasks to a prescribedstandard of airman competency in a specific aircraft and duty position.Level D flight simulators may be used for flight operational task trainingexcept for static aircraft training.<ITAG tagnum="21">[<T4>Note.</T4>_FYI: Level D Flight Simulators Comply With the TechnicalStandards Specified for ``Phase III Simulators'' in Part 121, AppendixH and AC 120-40 (as Amended).]</ITAG>B. <T3>Functional description.</T3> Level D flight simulators have the followingcharacteristics and components:andbullet; Systems representations, switches, and controls which are requiredby the type design of the aircraft and by the users approved training program.andbullet; Systems which respond appropriately and accurately to the switchesand controls of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Full-scale replication of the cockpit of the aircraft being simulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of the aerodynamic characteristics includingground effect, and ground dynamic characteristics of the aircraft beingsimulated.andbullet; Correct simulation of selected environmentally affected aerodynamicand ground dynamic characteristics of the aircraft being simulated consideringthe full range of its flight envelope in all approved configurations.andbullet; Correct and realistic simulation of the effects of environmentalconditions which the aircraft might encounter.andbullet; Control forces, dynamics, and travel which correspond to the aircraft.andbullet; Instructor controls and seat.andbullet; A daylight, dusk, and night visual system with at least a 75anddegrees;horizontal by 30anddegrees; vertical field of view for each pilot station.andbullet; A motion system with at least 6 degrees of freedom.<ITAG tagnum="81">89. Tables of Instruction/Evaluation Events Which Apply to Pilotsof Land and Sea Airplanes and Flight Engineers</ITAG>The following tables provide a list of events for developing approved flighttraining and evaluation curriculum segments for airplane operations.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M023</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration(s) 2 656-678</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-C</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 5. Continued Qualification Curriculums</ITAG>Section 1. General<ITAG tagnum="81">90. Purpose</ITAG>AQPs must include continued qualification curriculums which are based oncontinuing qualification cycles. The certificate holder may design continuingqualification cycles to efficiently utilize available training resourcesand to accommodate combinations of environmental and/or operational situationsthat are unique to the certificate holder. This chapter describes the activitiesthat constitute continued qualification and the requirements for developinga continuing qualification cycle.<ITAG tagnum="81">91. Application</ITAG>Continued qualification applies to all persons subject to an AQP, includinginstructors and evaluators. Fully qualified persons are automatically scheduledfor continued qualification activities specifically designed for theirduty position and aircraft assignment. A person who is qualified on morethan one make, model, and series of aircraft (or variant) or in more thanone duty position should be simultaneously enrolled in a separate continuedqualification curriculum for each assigned aircraft and duty position.However, a person who is simultaneously assigned as a flight crewmember,instructor, and evaluator on the same aircraft may be enrolled in a continuedqualification curriculum which combines the activities necessary to maintainskill and proficiency in all three duty positions.Section 2. Continued Qualification Activities<ITAG tagnum="81">92. Types of Activities</ITAG>Continued qualification curriculums should outline a uniform timetablefor the following: (i) Recurrent ground instruction; (ii) recurrent flightproficiency instruction; (iii) line oriented flight training; (iv) currencyactivities; (v) flight proficiency evaluations; and (vi) online evaluations.Continued qualification should have a proper balance between training,evaluation, and currency. Generally, continued qualification curriculumsegments contain the same elements and events as qualification curriculumsegments; however, continued qualification segments are usually not asdetailed about each element or event and require fewer planned hours. Continuedqualification curriculum segments exclude certification and supervisedoperating experience modules. For an example of a continued qualificationcurriculum see Figure 5-1.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration 2 681</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-C</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">93. Recurrent Ground Intruction</ITAG>Continued qualification must include recurring ground instruction and evaluationfor pilots in command, seconds in command, flight engineers, and instructorsand evaluators that includes a general review of knowledge and skills coveredin qualification training and updated information. Recurrent ground instructionreviews basic airmanship, including operational techniques, emergency situationtraining, the knowledge and skills required to operate a specific aircraft,and information concerning newly developed procedures. It includes newlydeveloped safety information and newly modified airmanship techniques.<ITAG tagnum="81">94. Recurrent Flight Proficiency Instruction</ITAG>Pilots in command, seconds in command, flight engineers, and those instructorsand evaluators who conduct flight training or flight evaluations in actualor simulated flight or in a flight training device must complete proficiencytraining designed for their respective duty position in an aircraft, flighttraining device, or flight simulator on normal, alternate, abnormal andemergency flight events. Recurrent flight proficiency training permitspilots and engineers to experience and practice the procedures and maneuvers(events) which are not normally encountered in day-to-day flight operations.For instructors and evaluators who are limited to conducting their dutiesin flight simulators and flight training devices, recurrent proficiencyflight training may be conducted only in flight simulators and flight trainingdevices.<ITAG tagnum="81">95. Line Oriented Flight Training</ITAG>In an AQP, LOFT is combined training and evaluation during operationalflight simulations designed to upgrade the skills and proficiency of flightcrewmembers both as individuals and as team members. These activities requireteam action in tactical decisionmaking while simultaneously requiring highquality demonstrations of individual abilities. Cockpit resource managementskills must be seriously tested and challenged by the scenarios designedfor LOFT. Acceptable criteria for this training are set forth in A/C 120-35A,``Line Oriented Flight Training''.<ITAG tagnum="81">95. Flight Crewmember Currency Activities</ITAG>The certificate holder's AQP should show that currency activities in FARPart 121.439 are complied with. The currency activities schedule, if notmet during line operations, may be satisifed through a flight currencyreestablishment activity specified in the continued qualification curriculum.Currency activities for instructors and evaluators who are not ``line crewmembers''will be specified in each AQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">97. Flight Proficiency Evaluations</ITAG>Flight proficiency evaluations may be conducted in a flight training device,aircraft, or flight simulator. Their purpose is to permit evaluation ofpilots, flight engineers, instructors, and evaluators as the perform theprocedures and maneuvers (events) specified for recurrent evaluations inthe continued qualification curriculums.<ITAG tagnum="81">98. Online Evaluations</ITAG>Online evaluations are evaluations of an entire flight crew which are conductedby an evaluator during actual flight operations under Parts 121 or 135or during operationally (line) oriented flights such as ferry flights orproving flights. These evaluations are required activities which must beincluded in the continued qualification curriculums only for pilots incommand. However, during online evaluations each person performing dutiesfor that flight as a pilot in command, second in command, or flight engineermust be individually evaluated as to: (1) Proficiency in the particularaircraft, crew position, and type of operation and (2) skills and abilityto operate effectively as part of a crew.Section 3. Continuing Qualification Cycles<ITAG tagnum="81">99. Level of Detail</ITAG>The continuing qualification curriculum should provide sufficient detailto show compliance with the SFAR. Elements of ground training activities,flight training activities, proficiency and online evaluations and currencyactivities should be specifically identified. The curriculum should specifythe period between each type of activity and the order in which they willbe performed. Developing a continuing qualification activity schedule involvesselecting, revising, and ordering appropriate modules from indoctrinationand qualification curriculums which should be regularly revisited to maintainboth individual and crew proficiency. Each continuing qualification curriculumwill identify the frequency of recurring training sessions at a trainingfacility for each person qualified under an AQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">100. Establishing Periodic Limits</ITAG>Each certificate holder must obtain approval of its continuing qualificationcycle and of a schedule of recurring training sessions that would occurwithin that cycle.a. <T3>Continuing qualification cycle.</T3> The first time a continuing qualificationcycle is approved the period of time for that cycle cannot exceed 26 months.Once a continuing qualification cycle has been in use and data shows thata period of more than 26 months is warranted, the certificate holder mayrequest an extended period. Under SFAR XX, the Administrator may approveextensions in increments not exceeding 3 months up to a maximum cycle of39 months.b. <T3>Recurring training sessions.</T3> Within the continuing qualificationcycle a certificate holder is required to establish a schedule of recurringtraining sessions at a training facility for each person qualified underan AQP. Initially the period between recurring training sessions may notexceed 13 months. As with the continuing qualification cycle, the timebetween recurring training sessions may, if warranted, be extended by theAdministrator in increments not exceeding 3 months, but the maximum timebetween sessions may not exceed 26 months.c. <T3>Justification for extensions.</T3> For an extension of a cycle or ofthe time between sessions to be warranted the certificate holder must beable to show that individuals subject to the AQP are able to maintain theirknowledge of skills under the already approved schedules and that thereis a solid and rational basis indicating that there will be no loss ofknowledge, skill, or abilities if a cycle or period between sessions isextended. Extensions will be allowed to continue, and additional extensionsgranted, only if a certificate holder's record and independent FAA evaluationshows that the extension is appropriate as a means to maintain or increasethe level of crewmember or dispatcher competency in air transportationoperations. The FAA has no intention of approving increased periods whichapproach the maximum allowed by SFAR XXX without substantial evidence thatthe increase is in the public interest and is a means of increasing safetyand efficiency in air transportation.d. <T3>New hires and new aircraft.</T3> When a certificate holder hires andindividual subject to training under an AQP, or when an individual underan AQP qualifies on an aircraft on which he has no previous experiencein his assigned duty position, the initial continuing qualification cycletime and the period of time between recurring training sessions will bethe minimum time periods stated in SFAR XX. Extended time periods thatmay have been granted to the certificate holder for more experienced personnelwill not immediately apply to newly qualified individuals. Newly qualifiedpersonnel may be transitioned to the extended cycles and training sessionsaccording to the means approved for this purpose in the certificate holder'sAQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">101. Schedule Divisions</ITAG>Continued qualification cycles should be subdivided and controlled by calendarsexpressed in months. The initial continued qualification cycle for a newlyenrolled flight crewmember can not exceed 26 calendar months and the initialrecurring training sessions at a training facility cannot be more than13 months apart. For an illustration of the interrelationship between recurringtraining sessions, evaluation, and currency activities within a continuingqualification cycle, see Figure 5-2.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illustration 2 688</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-C</ITAG>a. <T3>Recurring training sessions. </T3>Initially, and for newly qualifiedpersonnel, recurring training sessions should occur at equally spaced scheduledintervals of not more than 13 calendar months. Sessions which occur duringthe 2 months preceding the anniversary month of the last training sessionare considered to occur on schedule.b. <T3>Proficiency or online evaluations. </T3>For pilots, flight engineers,instructors, and evaluators, a proficiency evaluation in an aircraft, flighttraining device, and/or flight simulator must be completed during eachtraining session. For pilots-in-command, an online evaluation in an aircraftmust be completed within 30 days of which the midpoint date occurs betweenthe completion of the last preceding proficiency evaluation and the nextscheduled proficiency evaluation. The online evaluation should be conductedwithin the scheduled midpoint month or one month before or after the midpointmonth.Section 4. Scheduling and Requalification<ITAG tagnum="81">102. Extended Scheduling Time</ITAG>Both the period of continued qualification cycles and the period betweentraining sessions will be based on the continued demonstration of overalleffectiveness of a certificate holder's training programs and on the datasubmitted by the certificate holder to support its requests for extendedtimes. To ensure adequate qualification, a certificate holder must showthat its AQP has the capability to monitor each individual's demonstratedproficiency. This may mean that in certain cases individuals will requiremore frequent evaluation and/or training sessions.<ITAG tagnum="81">103. Flight Crewmember Requalification</ITAG>If a person fails to comply with the requirements of an approved continuedqualification curriculum, that person becomes unqualified for the dutyposition for which the curriculum is applicable and must be requalifiedin order to resume serving that duty position. An AQP should provide meansfor requalifying individuals who become unqualified. An AQP should alsoestablish time limits beyond which an individual would be required to repeatthe entire qualification process to requalify.<ITAG tagnum="81">104.-112.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 6. Recordkeeping and Data Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">113. General</ITAG>This chapter outlines the kinds of records and data that a certificateholder or training center should maintain. Section 1 describes recordsto be maintained on each person qualified under an AQP. Section 2 describesdata that must be collected to evaluate the effectiveness of an AQP.Section 1. Records on Qualified Individuals<ITAG tagnum="81">114. Recordkeeping Requirements</ITAG>A certificate holder or training center will establish and maintain appropriaterecords on each person qualified under an AQP. This section provides guidancein establishing and maintaining records. This section also presents guidelinesfor computerized recordkeeping systems on individuals.<ITAG tagnum="81">115. Basic Record Contents</ITAG>The record for each individual who is being qualified or has qualifiedunder an AQP should contain the following:(1) Full name (First, Middle Initial, Last) of the individual.(2) Current duty assignment (i.e. PIC, 737).(3) Previous qualifications (i.e., qualified PIC, DC-4, 16 January 1958).(4) Airman certificate, grade, number and ratings (if applicable).(5) Date, class, and, if applicable, limitations of the person's most recentmedical certificate.(6) Instructor/Evaluator qualifications and authorizations, if applicable.(7) Flight-time records_to include currency records for currently assignedaircraft which show compliance with all applicable flight time, duty, andrest requirements.(8) Any action taken concerning an individual's release from employmentfor physical or professional disqualifications.(9) Each individual's basic aeronautical experience in sufficient detailto determine that individual's qualification to perform in operations underParts 135 and/or 121.<ITAG tagnum="81">116. Training and Qualification Records</ITAG>A certificate holder or training center should maintain records of trainingand qualification for each individual qualified under an AQP. These recordsshould include the following:(1) Records of indoctrination, qualification, continued qualification,and individual one-time accomplishments required by regulation or by theoperator's approved training program and/or AQP for the person's <T3>current assignment(s). </T3>These records must initially be maintainedin sufficient detail to show the full scope of each curriculum and howthe individual satisfied the requirements of that curriculum. A line itementry that a curriculum was completed as of a particular date is not adequatefor establishing qualification for a current assignment.(2) Records which show the result and completion date of other trainingand qualification that permitted an individual to advance to his currentassignment.<ITAG tagnum="81">117. Retention of Records</ITAG>Records for individuals who qualify through an AQP should be retained inaccordance with the following guidelines.a. <T3>Minimum retention. </T3>The minimum retention period should ensurethat a person's pertinent training and qualification status can be determined.Detailed records, as described in paragraph 116 above, must be kept, showingeach person's participation in the AQP during the preceding 36 calendarmonths. Actions more than 36 months in the past may be documented by adated line item record. However, if actions more than 36 months old areto be used as the basis for later qualifications (e.g., changing to anothercertificate holder), detailed records must be available. In the absenceof detailed records, the individual will be required to fully completeall appropriate curriculum requirements. Certificate holders, individuals,and training centers, therefore, should understand the risks associatedwith discarding detailed records.b. <T3>Computer records. </T3>Use of computer record systems may be approved.c. <T3>Retention after release. </T3>All records should be kept for a periodof at least 6 months after a person's release from a duty assignment.<ITAG tagnum="81">118. Guidelines for Computerized Recordkeeping</ITAG>The following guidelines are provided for computerized recordkeeping systems.a. <T3>Guidelines. </T3>When designing a computerized recordkeeping system,use the following considerations:(1) Records should contain all of the required information which manualsystems must have.(2) Each record should be certified by an instructor, supervisor, or evaluator.(3) The certificate holder or training center should designate a representativeto be responsible for checking and validating the accuracy and completenessof the record.b. <T3>Approval. </T3>The following outlines the approval procedure for acomputerized recordkeeping system.(1) <T3>Interim approval. </T3>Interim approval may be granted for a computerizedrecordkeeping system. A request for interim approval should identify:(a) The type and location of computer equipment.(b) Methods for providing duplicate backup records to be used during theperiod of interim approval.(c) Methods and schedules for updating records.(d) The means used for identifying individuals.(e) The type and amount of training provided to qualify personnel who operateand maintain the computer system.(f) The means used to identify the instructors, supervisors or evaluatorswho certify that the results of accomplished training, evaluation, and/orqualification.(g) The validation checks proposed to be used to verify the accuracy ofinformation before it is entered into the computerized system.(h) The identity of the individual(s) responsible for conducting thesevalidation checks.(i) A procedure which ensures that persons responsible for making dataentries are clearly identified and that entries are made under the directcontrol of that person.(2) <T3>Final approval. </T3>Final approval is appropriate only after an operationaldemonstration shows that the computerized recordkeeping system is adequate,accurate, and secure.<ITAG tagnum="81">119.-123. Reserved</ITAG>Section 2. Data Collection for Program Evaluation<ITAG tagnum="81">124. Evaluation Plan</ITAG>Any certificate holder or training center should develop and submit withan AQP curriculum a plan for systematically evaluating its AQP.a. <T3>Purpose of the evaluation plan. </T3>The purpose of the evaluationplan is for the certificate holder to establish a means for monitoringthe effectiveness of an AQP curriculum in terms of how well it is meetingthe objectives.b. <T3>Duration of plan. </T3>The evaluation plan should remain in effectfor the life of an AQP. The plan should not be changed without notifyingthe FAA at least 30 days before the change would take effect. The FAA mayprohibit the proposed changes by identifying its reasons for doing so ina written explanation.c. <T3>Contents of the plan. </T3>The following elements should be includedin the evaluation plan:(1) A statement of the objectives of the AQP curriculum and the criteriafor determining if the objectives are being achieved.(2) Methods for examining courseware (lesson plans, work books, flightinstructor guides) to determine that they are consistent with the curriculum,organized for effective execution, and easy to revise.(3) Methods for observing instruction and training including lectures,computer-based instruction, presentations, and in-flight instruction. Factorsto evaluate are (i) if the instructor is organized and prepared; (ii) ifthe courseware is effectively used; (iii) if training aids function properly;and (iv) if the environment is conducive to learning.(4) Methods and materials for conducting evaluations to determine if learninghas occurred, including oral and written tests or flight tests.<ITAG tagnum="81">125. Data Collection</ITAG>Each qualification and continued qualification curriculum must includedata collection procedures. These procedures must be designed to collectinformation concerning the performance of the certificate holder's crewmembers,instructors, and evaluators. All data should be anonymous and geared tojudging performance trends as a result of training.(a) <T3>Purpose of data collection.</T3> (1) The data will be used by the certificateholder as part of its self-evaluation of the effectiveness of an AQP inmeeting the certificate holder's stated objectives. (2) The data will also be used by the FAA to determine that the certificateholder is meeting the objectives of its approved AQP. The data may indicateto the certificate holder and the FAA that a curriculum needs to be modifiedto meet the objectives of the curriculum. The information may also be usedto support a certificate holder's request for modifications of an approvedAQP. For example, if a certificate holder requests FAA approval for extendingintervals between recurrent training or evaluation activities under anAQP continuing qualification curriculum, the certificate holder must supportits request with collected data showing that present crewmember performancein evaluations warrants the extension. (3) The FAA will use data collected by certificate holders to establishcrewmember performance norms, and to judge the effectiveness of AQPs accordingto how well they meet or exceed these norms. The FAA may also use thisdata to compare with accident/incident statistics to determine the effectof AQP training programs on crewmember accident/incident rates. <ITAG tagnum="81">126. </ITAG>Kinds of Data To be Collected The kinds of data to be collected are described below. These are preliminaryguidelines which will be further developed as more information is acquired.a. <T3>Data from proficiency training and evaluation activities.</T3> Datashould be gathered and analyzed from proficiency training and evaluationactivities. The data should include, but not be limited to, the following:andbullet; The individual events accomplished. andbullet; The number of times each event was accomplished. andbullet; The individual events which required reaccomplishment. andbullet; The reasons an individual event required reaccomplishment. andbullet; The identification of and number of times that an activity wasclassified as ``incomplete'', ``not satisfactorily completed'', or ``unsatisfactory''.b. <T3>Data from Line Oriented Flight Training (LOFT) and Cockpit ResourceManagement (CRM) activities.</T3> Data should be gathered and analyzedfrom LOFT and CRM activities. The data should include, but not be limitedto, the following: andbullet; The identification of and number of times LOFT or CRM activitieswere ``incomplete'' or ``not satisfactorily completed.'' andbullet; The reasons that the LOFT or CRM activities were classified as``incomplete'' or ``not satisfactorily'' completed. c. <T3>Data from on line evaluations.</T3> Data should be gathered and analyzedfrom on line evaluations. The data should include, but not be limited to,the following: andbullet; The events observed. andbullet; The number of times each event was observed. andbullet; The events or elements which were classified as ``unsatisfactory'',``unacceptable'', or ``potentially unacceptable'' and the reasons for thatclassification. <ITAG tagnum="81">127.-130. Reserved </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 7. Airman Certification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">131. </ITAG>General SFAR XX provides an alternative practical testing means to certificatepilots, flight engineers, and dispatchers in AQPs. At this time, the processfor certification of dispatchers through AQPs has not been formulated butwill be addressed in a future version of this advisory circular. Also atthis time the process of certification of pilots thrugh AQPs is limitedto pilots who hold at least a Commercial Pilot certificate with an Instrumentrating before enrolling in an AQP. In the future the FAA may establishcriteria for other types of pilots. Until these criteria are developedthe FAA will review any certificate holder's request for other types ofpilot certification under an AQP on a case by case basis. <ITAG tagnum="81">132. </ITAG>Practical Test Criteria An applicant for certification must be eligible under the applicable requirementsof Part 61, 63, or 65, except that a certificate holder may develop practicaltests for airman certification which, when specifically approved by theManager, Air Carrier Training Branch, may be used in palce of the practicaltests prescribed in Part 61, 63, or 65 of the FAR. Development of practicaltests to be used in place of the practical tests prescribed in Part 61,63, or 65 should be based on the tables in Chapter 4 of this A/C and otherrelevant information such as aircraft flight manuals and Flight StandardizationBoard reports. <ITAG tagnum="81">133. </ITAG>Completion of Qualification Curriculum An applicant for airman certification must successfully complete the appropriatequalification curriculum. <ITAG tagnum="81">134. </ITAG>Demonstration of Individual Skills Certification applicants must show competence in required technical skillsand CRM skills in actual or simulated operational scenarios that test bothtypes of skills together. <ITAG tagnum="81">135. </ITAG>Authorized Evaluation Personnel Certification tests must be conducted by a person designated in writingby the Manager of the Air Carrier Training Branch as qualified to conductthe particular evaluation. Only the following personnel may be designatedby the Manager of the Air Carrier Training Branch to conduct airman certificationevaluations in an AQP. a. <T3>FAA operations inspectors</T3> who are currently qualified on the make,model, and series of aircraft (or variant) and who are thoroughly familiarwith the specific alternative evaluation process. b. <T3>Aircrfew program designees</T3> (APDs) currently qualified on the make,model, and series of aircraft (or variant), who have completed evaluatorqualification and maintain continued qualification as evaluator under theAQP. c. <T3>Designated air carrier examiners</T3> currently qualified on the make,model, and series of aircraft (or variant), who have completed evaluatorqualfication and maintain continued evaluator qualification under the AQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">136. </ITAG>Disposition of Airman Certification Documents Persons authorized to conduct airman certification evaluations under anAQP will issue either a temporary airman certificate or notice of disapprovalfor each certification evaluation conducted and will write ``SFAR XX''in the top margin of the application form. The completed file will be mailedto the FAA flight standards district office identified in the individualAQP for further disposition in accordance with FAA internal directives.<ITAG tagnum="81">137.140. Reserved </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 8. Training And Evaluation of Instructors and Evaluators </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">141. </ITAG>General Each AQP should provide for instructor and evaluator indoctrination, qualification,and continued qualification. <ITAG tagnum="81">142. </ITAG>Training and Evaluation Each instructor and evaluator should receive training in and be evaluatedon the methods of qualification and the use of flight simulators, flighttraining devices, aircraft, and other media used in the AQP. A means ofmaintaining currency in the use of these methods and media should be includedeach instructor and evaluator continued qualification curriculum. <ITAG tagnum="81">143. </ITAG>Instructor Courses a. <T3>Instructor indoctrination.</T3> Indoctrination for instructors shouldinclude the following elements: andbullet; The learning process. andbullet; Elements of effective teaching. andbullet; Student evaluation, quizzing, and testing. andbullet; Course development. andbullet; Lesson planning. andbullet; Classroom instructing techniques. andbullet; Techniques for instructing in the cockpit environment. b. <T3>Instructor qualification. </T3>Instructor qualification should includedevelopment of knowledge and skills in the following: andbullet; Effective use of specific training devices and simulators usedin the AQP. andbullet; Limitations on use of training devices and simulators used inthe AQP. andbullet; How to conduct training modules for students with varying backgroundsand levels of experience and ability. andbullet; Evaluation of flight performance against objective standards.andbullet; Effective preflight and postflight instruction. andbullet; Instructor responsibilities. andbullet; Effective analysis and correction of common flight errors. andbullet; Teaching CRM skills. andbullet; Performance and analysis of standard flight events and procedures.andbullet; Qualification at the instructor duty position in the simulator/trainingdevice/aircraft. andbullet; Safety consideration in the training environment. <ITAG tagnum="81">144. Evaluator Training and Evaluation </ITAG>Persons selected to be evaluators should have experience as instructorsand have shown their ability to observe and judge the effectiveness ofindividual training courses and of individual instructors, as well as theoverall effectiveness of an AQP. All evaluators must complete a curriculumwhich consists of evaluator indoctrination and evaluator qualification.After qualifying, evaluators must maintain their qualification throughparticipation in a continued qualification curriculum segment specificallydesigned to enhance evaluator skills, knowledge, and abilities. Whenevera person is maintaining qualification as both an instructor and an evaluator,a single continued qualification curriculum segment may be developed tomaintain both skills. Evaluator indoctrination curriculum segments includethe following elements: andbullet; Evaluation policies and techniques. andbullet; The role of the evaluator. andbullet; Administrative procedures. andbullet; General safety considerations. andbullet; Evaluating CRM skills. Evaluator qualification curriculum segments should include the followingelements and events: andbullet; For each crewmember position requiring a particular evaluationthe methods of conducting: (1) Online evaluations. (2) In flight proficiency evaluations. (3) Simulator/training device evaluations. (4) Special evaluations (i.e. long range navigation). (5) The standards for the evaluations in (1)-(4). (6) When applicable, the methods and standards associated with airmen certificationevaluations. andbullet; If applicable, how to conduct evaluations while simultaneouslyserving as PIC, SIC, or safety pilot. andbullet; Safety considerations for the various types of evaluations. andbullet; Safety considerations particular to the make, model, and seriesof aircraft (or variant). andbullet; How to evaluate instructors. andbullet; How to evaluate other evaluators. andbullet; Company policies with regard to the conduct of evaluations. andbullet; FAA policies with regard to the conduct of evaluations. andbullet; Administrative requirements particular to evaluations conductedin a specific make, model, and series of aircraft (or variant). andbullet; Evaluating CRM skills. Each evaluator continued qualification curriculum segment should includea schedule for recency of evaluator experience, recurrent ground and flighttraining to enhance, upgrade, and maintain each evaluator's knowledge,skills, and abilities. Each evaluator's continued qualification curriculumshould contain a schedule of evaluations during which a critical examinationof each evaluator's standardization and abilities is conducted. <ITAG tagnum="81">145. CRM Training and Evaluation </ITAG>In addition to the above, all instructors and evaluators should receiveinstruction and be evaluated in CRM objectives and training methods. Foradditional information on CRM training see Advisory Circular 121.xxx. <ITAG tagnum="81">146.-150. Reserved </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 9. Training Centers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">151. Purpose</ITAG>This chapter provides guidance to (1) any training center that intendsto provide training or evaluation for a certificate holder's AQP, and (2)any certificate holder that intends to arrange for a training center toaccomplish any of the certificate holder's training or evaluation underan AQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">152. General Guidelines</ITAG>a. <T3>Approval: When required.</T3> A certificate holder that provides trainingunder an AQP to its own employees does not need to be approved as a trainingcenter. A certificate holder that provides training for other certificateholders or any other organization that provides training for certificateholders is considered a training center and must obtain provisional approvalof each curriculum segment or portion of a curriculum segment that as atraining center it proposes to offer for use by other certificate holders.b. <T3>Generic training.</T3> A training center may apply for provisionalapproval to provide instruction and evaluation of generic aircraft andduty position-specific curriculum segments or portions of curriculum segments.A training center would not have to have a contract or other arrangementwith a particular certificate holder to obtain provisional approval. However,provisional approval does not convey automatic approval for use of thecurriculum segment as part of a certificate holder's AQP. Permission touse a training center's provisionally approved curriculum segment as partof a particular certificate holder's AQP depends on the FAA's assessmentof the appropriateness of the training center's generic curriculum materialto the certificate holder's specific needs. Modification of the trainingcenter's generic curriculum material will usually be required to ensurethe material is made to conform with the certificate holder's trainingand qualification needs. Instructors and evaluators employed by trainingcenters must demonstrate competency to teach and evaluate in conformitywith the certificate holder's approved training and qualification standards,as well as its operational methods, techniques, and procedures.c. <T3>Certificate holder operations-specific training.</T3> Generally, operations-specific(i.e., specific to a certificate holder) training will be provided directlyby a certificate holder rather than by a training center. A certificateholder that wishes to contract with or otherwise arrange for conduct ofoperations-specific curriculum segments by a training center must showthat the training center and its instructors and evaluators are fully qualifiedand competent to accomplish operations-specific curriculum segments.<ITAG tagnum="81">153. Applications For Provisional Approval of Training Center CurriculumMaterial</ITAG>a. <T3>Application for provisional approval.</T3> Application for approvalis made to the Air Carrier Training Branch through the training center'slocal Flight Standards District Office.b. Each application should specify the training or evaluation to be approved.c. Application should be in letter form and accompanied by the proposedcurriculum materials, descriptions of training facilities and equipment,personnel qualifications, and proposed evaluation plans.d. Application should describe the extent of training/evaluation approvalsought (e.g. Pilot-in-Command, indoctrination and qualification, trainingand evaluations, B-727, Generic elements and events).e. The application should contain curriculums, procedures, and supportingdocumentation which address the following issues:(1) Instructor training and evaluation: The applicant must have an approvedcurriculum for the qualification and continued qualification of each instructoror evaluator employed by the applicant.(2) Facilities: The applicant's facilities must be adequate for any plannedtraining or evaluation for a Part 121 or Part 135 certificate holder.(3) Simulators/flight training devices: The applicant should describe andidentify flight simulators and flight training devices to be used. (SeeChapter 11)(4) Training aids/computer based instructional equipment: The applicantshould describe and identify training aids and computer based instructionalequipment to be used. (See Chapter 10)(5) Recordkeeping systems: The applicant should describe recordkeepingsystems that identify and validate the training and evaluation of instructorsand evaluators. (See Chapter 6)(6) A curriculum, curriculum segment, or portion of a curriculum segmentmust identify the specific make, model, and series of aircraft (or variant)and crewmember or other positions for which it is designed. A general indoctrinationcurriculum does not have to meet this requirement.f. Applications to revise existing programs need only address applicableitems.<ITAG tagnum="81">154. Approval For Use In An AQP</ITAG>Approval for use of provisionally approved training center's curriculumsegments in a certificate holder's AQP will be given only at the time thecertificate holder applies for approval of its AQP and only if the FAAdetermines that the curriculum segments are appropriate for the certificateholder's required training.<ITAG tagnum="81">155.-160. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 10. Computer Based Instructional/Evaluation Systems  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">161. Purpose  </ITAG>This chapter provides guidance under which computer based instructionalsystems may be approved for use in an AQP.  <ITAG tagnum="81">162. General  </ITAG>Computer based systems may be approved for use in an AQP for instructionand/or evaluation.  <ITAG tagnum="81">163. Approval  </ITAG>The following paragraphs outline approval procedures for computer basedinstructional/evaluation systems.  a. <T3>Initial approval.</T3> Initial approval may be given for computer basedinstructional/evaluation systems as an interim approval for testing. Theproposal should include:  1. Type and location of computer equipment.  2. Methods for providing duplicate backup records.  3. Methods for updating programs.  4. The type and amount of training to qualify personnel to operate andmaintain the computer system.  5. A procedure to ensure program security.  6. A procedure that ensures that the persons authorized and responsiblefor monitoring evaluations are clearly identified and that evaluationsare monitored only by authorized persons.  7. Instructional/evaluational objectives for each program.  8. Program structure and sequence.  9. Performance monitoring program (validation).  <ITAG tagnum="81">164.-170. Reserved </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 11. Qualification of Flight Simulators and Flight TrainingDevices for Use in an AQP</ITAG>Section 1. Approval of Training Devices And Simulators  <ITAG tagnum="81">171. General  </ITAG>SFAR XX requires that a flight simulator or flight training device usedin an AQP be evaluated against a set of criteria established by the Administratorfor a particular level of simulation (a qualification level). Once a flightsimulator or flight training device is approved for a level of simulation,it must be specifically approved by the Administrator for its intendeduse in an AQP. Approval for qualification level and approval for use ina specific AQP constitutes initial qualification. Once a flight simulatoror flight training device is approved for its intended use in an AQP, itmust be part of a flight simulator or flight training device continuingqualification program. This chapter outlines acceptable procedures forthe qualification and continuing qualification of flight simulators andflight training devices for use in an AQP.  <ITAG tagnum="81">172. Criteria For Flight Simulator And Flight Training Device InitialQualification Approval  </ITAG>The Administrator shall approve the qualification level of a simulatoror training device in accordance with the following criteria:  a. The criteria for airplane simulators is in Advisory Circular 120-40,as amended, ``Airplane Simulator Qualification.''  b. The criteria for flight training devices is in Advisory Circular 120-45,as amended, ``Airplane Flight Training Devices Qualification.''  c. Criteria for helicopter simulators and training devices qualificationare being developed and will be released at a later date in an advisorycircular.  <ITAG tagnum="81">173. Initial Approval of Flight Simulators And Flight Training DevicesFor Use In An AQP  </ITAG>As part of the approval of an AQP, the FAA will approve use of a flightsimulator or flight training device for use in the AQP. Chapter 4 of thisAdvisory Circular presents tables that specify the use of simulators andtraining devices in flight instruction and evaluation. Each AQP curriculumsegment which includes use of a flight simulator or flight training deviceshould specify the make, model, serial number and manufacturer of the flightsimulator or flight training device or the FAA identification number ofthe flight simulator or flight training device assigned by the NationalSimulator Program Manager.  <ITAG tagnum="81">174. Currently Qualified Devices  </ITAG>Training devices and simulators currently qualified by the Administratormay be used in approved AQP training programs for training, evaluation,and qualification of airmen at the current qualification level withoutcompleting an additional evaluation.  <ITAG tagnum="81">175. Other Devices, Not Currently Qualified  </ITAG>Training devices or simulators not currently qualified by the Administratormay be used in an approved AQP for training, evaluation, and qualificationof airmen once they have been evaluated for the appropriate aircraft andtype of device and have received FAA qualification and approval for usein AQP.  Section 2. Continuing Qualification  <ITAG tagnum="81">176. Maintaining Qualification Of Simulators And Training Devices </ITAG>Each flight simulator and flight training device used in an AQP should: a. <T3>Maintain the performance,</T3> functions, and other characteristicsthat are required for that qualification level as demonstrated during theinitial or upgrade evaluation;  b. <T3>Be modified to conform with any modification</T3> to the aircraft beingreplicated or any modification or change to the mathematical model usedthat results in a change in the performance, functions, or other characteristicsthat may affect the operation of the device at that qualification level;  c. <T3>Be given a daily functional preflight check</T3> before use;  d. <T3>Have a discrepancy log</T3> that the instructor or evaluator enterseach discrepancy into at the end of each training or evaluation session;and  e. <T3>Have a documented software configuration control system</T3> whichcontains a record of all software changes or modifications and which assuresthat systems software changes which might offset flight performance inhandling qualities, ground handling, or systems functions approved by theAdministrator be implemented only after notification to and concurrenceby the Administrator.  <ITAG tagnum="81">177. Failure To Maintain Initial Qualification Level  </ITAG>Except as noted in the paragraph below, aircraft training devices or aircraftsimulators failing to maintain the performance, functions, and other characteristicsthat are required for initial qualification may not be used in training,evaluation, or certification of airmen.  <ITAG tagnum="81">178. Component Inoperative Guide  </ITAG>If the Administrator has authorized the use of a Component InoperativeGuide (CIG) for the aircraft training device or aircraft simulator, andany performance, functions, or other characteristic does not meet the criteriafor initial qualification because of an inoperative component listed inthe CIG, the FAA will limit but not prohibit the use of the device in theAQP.  <ITAG tagnum="81">179. Responsibility of Sponsor  </ITAG>As used in this Advisory Circular with respect to training devices or simulators,``sponsor'' is a person who requests that the Administrator conduct anevaluation of a training device or simulator (for assignment of a qualificationlevel for airmen training, evaluation, or certification); and agrees toaccept the responsibilities outlined in paragraphs a., b., and c. below. a. <T3>Maintaining performance level.</T3> Each sponsor of an aircraft trainingdevice or aircraft simulator used in a training program approved underthis SFAR shall be responsible for ensuring that the device maintains theperformance, functions, and other characteristics required for the qualificationlevel assigned as a result of the initial or upgrade evaluation.  b. <T3>Maintenance.</T3> The sponsor may arrange with another person for themaintenance, preventive maintenance, or required testing of the device;however, this does not relieve the sponsor of the responsibility in paragrapha. above. c. <T3>Component Inoperative Guide (CIG). </T3>The sponsor shall remove thetraining device or simulator from use, or limit its use according to theCIG, when the sponsor is first made aware that any problems exists withthe device that affects its performance, functions, or other characteristics.In such situations, as soon as possible, the sponsor must inform any personusing, or scheduled to use, the device that its use has been suspendedor limited, and, if limited, how it has been limited.d. <T3>Withdrawing sponsorship. </T3>At least 30 days before withdrawing asa sponsor, the sponsor should notify the Administrator and any person using,or scheduled to use, the device that he is withdrawing as sponsor of thetraining device or simulator.<ITAG tagnum="81">180. Scheduled Recurrent Evaluations</ITAG>Training devices and simulators not previously qualified by the Administratoror those being upgraded for use in an AQP shall be included in a continuingqualification program and evaluation schedule. Training devices and simulatorspreviously qualified by the Administrator and used in an AQP will followthe previously arranged and approved schedule for recurrent evaluationand the currently approved Approval Test Guide (ATG). However, the evaluationwill be conducted as outlined in this Advisory Circular and recorded asa scheduled recurrent evaluation. Subsequent scheduled recurrent evaluationwill follow an established due date.<ITAG tagnum="81">181. Time Periods for Scheduled Recurrent Evaluations</ITAG>The scheduled recurrent evaluations shall be accomplished according tothe following schedule:a. <T3>The first scheduled recurrent evaluation </T3>will be conducted notlater than the sixth (6) month after the initial or upgrade evaluation.At this first recurrent evaluation a due month will be scheduled for subsequentrecurrent evaluations.b. <T3>Subsequent scheduled recurrent evaluations </T3>should be conductedat twelve (12) months intervals except as noted below. Failure to accomplishan evaluation in accordance with the evaluation schedule will result inloss of qualification status for the device.c. <T3>Flexibility. </T3>Scheduled recurrent evaluations conducted in themonth before or the month after the due month will be considered to havebeen accomplished during the due month. Scheduled recurrent evaluationsmay also be conducted more than one month before the due month if properlycoordinated. However, this would establish a new due month for subsequentscheduled recurrent evaluations.d. <T3>Time required for a recurrent evaluation. </T3>Scheduled recurrentevaluations will normally be scheduled for 8 hours and will consist offunctional tests and approximately 50 percent of the tests in the ATG.Additionally, in accordance with a schedule approved by the Administratorand at 2 equally spaced intervals between the scheduled recurrent evaluations,the sponsor will conduct 50 percent of the balance of the validation tests(25 percent of the ATG tests), certify that the test results are withinprescribed tolerances, and maintain the results in a file for review bythe National Simulator Program Manager. Such a schedule means that allvalidation tests in the ATG will be completed annually.<ITAG tagnum="81">182. No-Notice Evaluations</ITAG>During the interval between the scheduled recurrent evaluations, the Administratorwill conduct at least one (1) no-notice recurrent evaluation.a. <T3>Content. </T3>A no-notice recurrent evaluation will consist of thefollowing:(1) A review of ATG validation tests accomplished since the last recurrentevaluation  (either  scheduled  or no-notice);(2) A review of the device's discrepancy log (including daily maintenancepreflight, discrepancies, and action taken to clear discrepancies); and(3) Observation of the device during normally scheduled training or evaluationfunctions.b. <T3>Additional content. </T3>If the training device is available, the followingitems may also be accomplished:(1) Assessing the state of the visual, motion, and other systems; and(2) Flying the device.c. <T3>Reason for limiting the content. </T3>A no-notice recurrent evaluationdoes not have the same level of detail and does not take as long as a scheduledrecurrent evaluation because it is based on the premise that the sponsoris maintaining the performance, functions, and other characteristics ofthe device at the level required for initial qualification.<ITAG tagnum="81">183. Change of Qualification Level</ITAG>The upgrading of a training device or simulator may occur only after initialor upgrade evaluation. The downgrading of a training device or simulatormay occur only after a special evaluation or a scheduled recurrent evaluation.<ITAG tagnum="81">184. Discrepancies</ITAG>If the evaluator observes a discrepancy during the scheduled recurrentevaluation or the no-notice evaluation which, in his opinion, may affectthe qualification status, he may, after notifying the sponsor of his discovery,and at his discretion, withdraw the qualification status of the device.This original qualification status may be regained through correction ofthe discrepancy and on the authority of the National Simulator ProgramManager.<ITAG tagnum="81">185.-195. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 12. Role of the Air Carrier Training Branch</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">196. Purpose and Responsibilities of the Air Carrier Training Branch</ITAG>The FAA has established an Air Carrier Training Branch at Washington Headquarters.A primary purpose for this branch is to ensure a standardized AQP approvalprocess. This staff will assume the responsibility for the review and analysisof air carrier training programs submitted to it for approval under theprovisions of SFAR XXX. This staff will also provide technical assistanceto certificate holders and training centers in the development of theircurriculums. (This is an advisory role only. See Chapter 13 for furtherinformation on technical assistance.) If a submitted AQP curriculum adheresto the standards described in SFAR XX and other chapters of this advisorycircular, the Air Carrier Training Branch has the final authority to approveor disapprove the AQP curriculum.<ITAG tagnum="81">197. Technical Assistance to the Staff</ITAG>During the review and analysis stage of an AQP application, the assignedprincipal operations inspectors and other appropriate FAA personnel willparticipate in the review. The exchange of information between field personneland the Air Carrier Training Branch will result in sharing technical informationand a standardized approval process.<ITAG tagnum="81">198. Application for approval</ITAG>Following the procedures contained in Chapter 13, an operator may applyto the Air Carrier Training Branch for evaluation of its proposed AQP.Any Parts 121 or 135 certificate holder may apply through their assignedPOI. These applications will be screened and reviewed on a timely basisdepending on resources, workload, and the complexity of the application.In order to keep the process timely, additional field and headquarterspersonnel may be detailed to the Air Carrier Training Branch on a temporarybasis. The expected time for the review process for a newly developed curriculumis 6 months.<ITAG tagnum="81">199.-205.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Chapter 13. Approval Process for an AQP</ITAG>Section 1. General <ITAG tagnum="81">206. The Approval Process</ITAG>A certificate holder that already has an approved training program underParts 121 or 135 will submit a transition plan (including a schedule ofevents) that shows how it will change from its standard training to advancedqualification training. In all their respects the procedural requirementsof andSection;andSection; 121.405 or 135.325, as applicable will apply. Theapproval process for an AQP includes provisional, initial, and final approval.The approval process discussed in this section applies to Parts 121 and135 certificate holders and to operators of training centers who participatein an AQP. This includes but is not limited to aircraft manufacturers andto organizations whose primary business is aeronautical training. The approvalprocess applies to a request for a new AQP or to revisions to a currentlyapproved AQP. This chapter establishes how the FAA will grant or withdrawapproval of all or part of an AQP. Approval is handled by the Air CarrierTraining Branch at FAA Headquarters, Washington, DC, except for approvalof training on hazardous materials and security, which must be coordinatedwith the Office of Civil Aviation Security (FAA) and the Office of HazardousMaterials (Research and Special Projects Administration).<ITAG tagnum="81">207. Initiating the Process</ITAG>The approval process can be initiated in two ways: (1) An operator caninform the FAA by letter of plans to establish or change an AQP; or (2)the FAA can inform an operator that revisions to its AQP are required basedon acquired information relative to training techniques, aviation technology,aircraft operational history, or operator performance.<ITAG tagnum="81">208.-210.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reserved</ITAG>Section 2. Developing an AQP and Initial Approval<ITAG tagnum="81">211. FAA Guidance</ITAG>The FAA will provide guidance to a certificate holder or training centerwho intends to develop an AQP program or revise one. The FAA will providethe following help.a. <T3>An operations specialist.</T3> The FAA will identify an FAA operationsspecialist as the primary contact for the certificate holder or trainingcenter. The FAA representative and the certificate holder will review allgeneral requirements in the FARs and the specific guidelines in the A/Cwhich are applicable to the operation. The FAA representative will alsodetermine if assistance from any other FAA specialists is needed.b. <T3>Format and content.</T3> The FAA will provide advice to the certificateholder or training center on the procedures in the approval process andthe types of information required to support the application for approval.The FAA will also provide advice on the general format and content of curriculums,curriculum segments, modules, flight event descriptions, courseware, facilities,and qualifications of instructors and evaluators. c. <T3>Advisory capacity only.</T3> The FAA will act in an advisory capacityonly. Inspectors will not participate in the actual development of curriculums.The certificate holder or training center is responsible for the developmentof its curriculum material and the FAA will not assume that responsibility.<ITAG tagnum="81">212. Submission of an AQP Curriculum</ITAG>The approval process begins when a certificate holder or training centersubmits to the FAA an AQP curriculum or curriculum segment (or portionof a curriculum segment) with relevant supporting information. A discussionof the entire AQP package appears in Chapter 2 of this A/C. The curriculumoutlines and supporting information must be submitted by letter requestingapproval. Two copies of each curriculum or curriculum segment should accompanythe application letter.<ITAG tagnum="81">213. General Format</ITAG>Each certificate holder or training center must submit its own specificcurriculum and curriculum segment outlines appropriate to make, model,and series of aircraft (or variant) and kinds of operation. The formatof outlines may differ from one applicant to another. However, each curriculumor curriculum segment should be easy to revise and include a method foradministrative tracking and control revisions. Curriculums for differentduty positions may be combined in one curriculum provided the curriculumspecifically identifies the duty positions and specifies any differencein instruction for each duty position. Details of curriculum and curriculumsegment outlines are described in Chapter 2 of this A/C.<ITAG tagnum="81">214. Supporting Information</ITAG>Certificate holders and training centers should submit additional supportinginformation as described in Chapter 2 of this A/C and as requested by theFAA. Supporting information includes information that would be difficultto provide in a curriculum outline format. The type of supporting informationmay vary depending on the type of training, aircraft to be operated, andkinds of operations.<ITAG tagnum="81">215. Review of Documents</ITAG>The FAA will conduct two reviews of the submitted documents. The firstis a preliminary review to determine that the package is complete. Thesecond is an indepth review to determine if the AQP meets the requirementsof applicable regulations and the guidelines of appropriate A/Cs.a. <T3>Preliminary review.</T3> During the preliminary review the FAA reviewsthe submission for completeness, general content, and overall quality.If the submission appears to be complete, the FAA will begin an indepthreview. If the submission is incomplete or conspicuously unacceptable,the FAA will return the submission within 15 working days with an explanationof the deficiencies. In this situation the approval process ceases untilthe curriculum or curriculum segment is corrected and resubmitted.b. <T3>Indepth review.</T3> The purpose of this review is to determine theacceptability of curriculums for initial or provisional approval. The reviewends with either initial or provisional approval or with rejection of allor part of the AQP curriculum.(1) <T3>Involvement of FAA specialists.</T3> To complete an indepth reviewthe Air Carrier Training Branch may need to involve other FAA personnel.The following specialists or offices may be asked to participate in theapproval process:andbullet; The PAI and PMI may be involved in qualification issues concerningweight and balance procedures, minimum equipment list procedures, long-rangenavigation, and lower weather minimums procedures and equipment.andbullet; Various aviation safety inspector specialties will be involvedwhen appropriate. For example, navigation specialists should be involvedwith evaluating special navigation operations.andbullet; The Flight Standardization Board (FSB) and Flight Operations EvaluationBoard (FOEB) will be used to provide information on training recommendationsand minimum equipment list procedures.(2) <T3>Evaluations.</T3> Before recommending that the Air Carrier TrainingBranch grant or deny initial or provisional approval for a specific curriculumor curriculum segment, the FAA representative must ensure that the followingevaluations are accomplished:andbullet; A side-by-side examination of the curriculum outline with theguidance provided in this A/C to determine if the AQP includes all appropriatetraining and testing in required elements and events.andbullet; An examination of the certificate holder's courseware, includingsample of lesson plans, audiovisual programs, flight maneuver and proceduredocuments, and student handouts.andbullet; An inspection of training facilities, training devices, and instructionalaids.andbullet; A determination of the appropriateness of the training hours specifiedin each curriculum segment outline. While training hours alone would notdetermine the quality of an AQP, the specified training hours must be realisticin terms of the complexity of each curriculum segment.<ITAG tagnum="81">216. Delays</ITAG>Operators should be aware of potential delays to approval. Delays may occurfor any of the following reasons:andbullet; Not meeting the proposed schedule of events for submitting toFAA inspection.andbullet; Failing to expeditiously transmit information to the FAA.andbullet; Change in plans (e.g., changing training locations).andbullet; Deficiencies discovered in the program.andbullet; Delays in obtaining equipment (e.g., simulators) or equipmentapproval.<ITAG tagnum="81">217. New Air Operators</ITAG>An applicant for a new air operator certificate may be unable to provideall the information required for its AQP application. The applicant maynot yet know what training facilities or devices will be used. The lackof such information will not automatically result in a rejection of thetraining curriculum. If the operator and the FAA have identified the missingportions, the FAA can conduct an indepth review. However, the FAA willwithhold initial or provisional approval until all pertinent portions ofa specific curriculum or curriculum segment have been examined and foundacceptable. If an excessive number of curriculum segments are incomplete,the FAA may be unable to conduct an indepth review. In such a situation,the FAA will either return the submission with an explanation or delaythe indepth review until the necessary information is submitted.<ITAG tagnum="81">218. Method of Granting Initial or Provisional Approval</ITAG>a. <T3>Approval of letter. </T3>The FAA grants initial or provisional AQPapproval by letter. The initial or provisional approval letter includesat least the following information:andbullet; Specific identification of the curriculums and curriculum segmentsinitially or provisionally approved including page numbers and revisioncontrol dates.andbullet; A statement that initial or provisional approval is granted andwhat the effective and expiration dates (for initial approval) are.andbullet; Any specific conditions affecting the initial or provisional approval.andbullet; A request for advance notice of activity schedules so that programevaluations may be planned.b. <T3>Copies. </T3>A copy of the training curriculum, curriculum segments,with a copy of the transmittal letter attached shall be maintained on filein the certificate holder's District Office by the POI during the periodinitial approval is valid. A copy of the same material shall be maintainedby the Air Carrier Training Branch. Copies of a training center's provisionallyapproved curriculum material shall be maintained at the training center'slocal Flight Standards District Office, the Air Carrier Training Branch,and the certificate holder's assigned District Office.<ITAG tagnum="81">219. Method of Denying Initial or Provisional Approval</ITAG>If the FAA determines that initial or provisional approval of a proposedcurriculum or curriculum segment must be denied, the FAA will notify allthe affected operators in writing. The letter of notification identifiesany deficiency in a curriculum which was the cause of denial. The principaloperator may redevelop or correct the deficient portion and resubmit theAQP for approval.<ITAG tagnum="81">220. Expiration Dates For Initial Approval</ITAG>A curriculum granted initial approval has an expiration date. Usually,this date shall not be later than 24 months after the initial approvaldate. When the FAA decides not to grant final approval before the expirationdate, it must notify the certificate holder of this decision in writing,at least 30 days before the expiration date of the initially-approved curriculum.Final approval may not be granted for several reasons. One reason, forexample, may be the certificate holder's inability to achieve an acceptablelevel of training effectiveness during the approval process. Another exampleof a reason for not granting final approval is the discontinued use ofthe initially-approved curriculum. The notification letter should containthe reasons for allowing the curriculum to expire and should state thatany further activity under the expired curriculum will not be in compliancewith regulatory requirements. Should the FAA inadvertently fail to provide30-day notification, it must establish a new expiration date for the curriculumso that appropriate notification can then be given to the certificate holder.A certificate holder not so notified should not assume that the initialapproval will continue in effect until receipt of notification of eitherfinal approval or termination. If the FAA does not grant final approvalbefore the expiration date, activities conducted under that curriculummust terminate as of that date.<ITAG tagnum="81">221. Withdrawal of Initial or Provisional Approval</ITAG>The FAA may decide to withdraw initial or provisional approval at any timethe AQP is not in regulatory compliance, does not provide for safe operations,or does not effectively prepare crewmembers or dispatchers to meet qualificationobjectives. The FAA withdraws initial or provisional approval by letterwhich states that initial or provisional approval is withdrawn, reasonsfor the withdrawal, and the effective date of withdrawal. A certificateholder or training center who receives a letter of withdrawal may reviseor refine the curriculum and resubmit it for initial or provisional approval.<ITAG tagnum="81">222.-230. Reserved</ITAG>Section 3. Final Approval Process<ITAG tagnum="81">231. Evaluating Initially Approved Curriculums</ITAG>An AQP user should provide the POI with ongoing schedules of all training,evaluation, and other activities to be accomplished under an initiallyapproved AQP. The POI and Air Carrier Training Branch will monitor theseactivities whenever possible. An FAA inspector should be present at enoughactivities to evaluate the effectiveness of the program. If deficienciesare detected, the FAA will notify the certificate holder or training centerin writing. Adjustments may be minor or may substantially change the curriculumand require a new approval process. If the applicant transmits proposedrevisions to the FAA before the expiration date of initial approval, theFAA may establish a separate, extended expiration date for those revisionsto allow sufficient time for evaluation. If a certificate holder or trainingcenter fails to make adjustments for any identified deficiencies, the FAAshall advise the certificate holder in writing that initial or provisionalapproval is withdrawn.<ITAG tagnum="81">232. Final Approval</ITAG>Based on the results of the evaluation accomplished during initial approval,the FAA will determine whether to grant or deny final approval of an AQP.This determination is made before the expiration date of the initial approval.Final approval is <T3>never </T3>directly granted for provisionally approved AQPs. If theFAA grants final approval the procedures described below are followed.a. <T3>Stamped approval. </T3>The original and a copy of each page of anyAQP curriculum and curriculum segment are stamped approved, dated, andsigned by a designated FAA operations official. The approval stamp appearson each page and is a facsimile of the following stamp:FAA APPROVEDOFFICE DESIGNATOR: <ITAG tagnum="77">_________</ITAG>EFFECTIVE DATE: <ITAG tagnum="77">_________</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="88">13-12   </ITAG>NAME: <ITAG tagnum="77">_________</ITAG>SIGNATURE: <ITAG tagnum="77">_________</ITAG>b. <T3>Approval letter. </T3>The original of the stamped curriculum or curriculumsegment is transmitted to the certificate holder with an approval lettersigned by the Manager, Air Carrier Training Branch. When training centersare not involved, the Manager, Air Carrier Training Branch, may delegatethis authority to the certificate holder's assigned POI. The letter specificallyidentifies the curriculum or curriculum segment, contains a statement thatfinal approval is granted, and provides the effective date of approval.The letter also states that final approval remains in effect until otherwisenotified by the FAA.c. <T3>Copies. </T3>A copy of the stamped curriculum or curriculum segmentand a copy of the approval letter is kept on file in the certificate holder'sDistrict Office, at the Air Carrier Training Branch, and at the locationdesignated by the operator as its principal training site. If a trainingcenter is involved, a copy of pertinent portions of the curriculum arekept on file at the training center and the District Office assigned tothe surveillance of the training center.<ITAG tagnum="81">233.-240. Reserved</ITAG>Section 4. Continuing Evaluation<ITAG tagnum="81">241. Continuing Evaluation</ITAG>Although the level of monitoring and evaluation by the FAA normally diminishesafter an AQP has received final approval, the operator's evaluation plancontinues (along with FAA monitoring of the AQP) for the life of the AQP.<ITAG tagnum="81">242. Revision To An AQP</ITAG>Revisions to an AQP usually require a complete approval process. However,the process may be abbreviated according to the extent of the revision.Circumstances that typically trigger revisions are changes in the kindsof operations, size and complexity of operations, or type of aircraft operated;special authorizations through operations specifications, maintenance program,or MEL: and exemptions or deviations. The Manager, Air Carrier TrainingBranch, may delegate certain approval authority for revision to POIs throughFAA internal directives.<ITAG tagnum="81">243. Withdrawal of Approval</ITAG>The FAA may withdraw approval of a curriculum anytime after its final approvalif the FAA determines that sufficient safety reasons exist. The FAA willmake reasonable efforts to convince a certificate holder to make any necessarycorrections to its AQP before withdrawing approval. The FAA withdraws approvalby letter which identifies the AQP affected, states the reasons for thewithrawal, and states the effective date of the withdrawal (not less thanseven days except in an emergency). The letter advises the certificateholder that withdrawal may be appealed and contains instructions on howto appeal.<ITAG tagnum="81">244. Appeal of a Withdrawal</ITAG>To appeal the FAA withdrawal of final approval, a certificate holder shouldpetition the Manager, Flight Standards Service, AFS-1, for reconsiderationwithin 30 days after receiving withdrawal notification. The petition shouldbe in writing and explain in detail why the certificate holder believesthe revisions described in the withdrawal notice are not necessary. TheManager, Flight Standards Service, AFS-1, may immediately deny the appealupon receipt if the Manager believes that an emergency exists which directlyaffects aviation safety. The Manager will inform the certificate holderin writing of the decision to deny the appeal. The letter will state thatan emergency exists and describes the required revisions and the reasonsfor the revisions. If the Manager does not believe an emergency exists,the Manager carefully considers both the certificate holder's petitionand the FAA's reason for withdrawal of approval. The certificate holder'spetition stays the withdrawal and the certificate holder may continue touse the AQP curriculum pending the decision of the Manager, Flight StandardsService, AFS-1. The Manager may find it necessary to conduct additionalevaluations of the certificate holder's AQP. In any case, the Manager willmake a final decision within 60 days of receiving the certificate holder'sappeal. The Manager may rescind the letter of withdrawal or uphold thewithdrawal action. If the decision is to uphold the withdrawal action,the certificate holder will be notified by letter. The letter will containthe reasons for denying the petition and a statement confirming the withdrawalof final AQP approval.<ITAG tagnum="81">245. Expiration</ITAG>Final approval does not have an expiration date.<ITAG tagnum="81">246.-255. Reserved</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-3985 Filed 2-16-89; 4:51 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>